

https://www.nps.gov/articles/oss-in-action-the-mediterranean-and-european-theaters.htm
	For nearly ten months, until the summer of 1944, U.S. Army commanders in Italy failed to understand how best to use the men of Donovan’s organization, because many of the professional soldiers still viewed them with a mixture of jealousy and contempt as privileged but naïve amateurs. As Peter Tompkins, the highly successful SI agent in Tome, recalled bitterly, “Unfortunately, despite the fact that we had been at war over two years, the OSS had been granted little opportunity by field commanders to prove itself an effective weapon of espionage and sabotage behind the enemy lines; most of us were still being frowned on by the brass as a collection of madmen.


https://books.google.com/books/about/The_magic_of_obelisks.html?id=heZOAAAAMAAJ
	The magic of obelisks

	Peter Tompkins


hmmmm


------



https://books.google.com/books?id=nGLcu_QQB6cC&pg=PA100&lpg=PA100
	In early October, a group of antifascist exiles returned to Italy. They collaborated with Raimondo Craveri, a leading member of the Action party, and Bendetto Croce. They fashioned a proposal that would create the National Liberation Front an independent unit of Italian volunteers that would fight with the Allies.


https://books.google.com/books?id=JtoyDQAAQBAJ&pg=PA142&lpg=PA142&dq=Maurizio+Giglio+Cervo&source=bl&ots=ToPCDjq5SB&sig=EBsAhIj2j-SUZYlTkr6TJO29RJg&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwiC4YfRq_baAhVPJt8KHcfKAD8Q6AEITjAE#v=onepage&q=Maurizio%20Giglio%20Cervo&f=false




https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Maurizio_Giglio
	Maurizio Giglio (20 December 1920 - 24 March 1944) was an Italian soldier and policeman. In September 1943, during World War II, the Italian government concluded an armistice with the Allies. He thereafter transmitted military intelligence by radio from Rome about the Nazi forces there to the Allied forces advancing through southern Italy.

	...On 3 September 1943, Italy and the Allies signed the Armistice of Cassibile. Nazi Germany did not learn of it until 8 September, when news of it was broadcast by Allied radio stations. The Germans retaliated by immediately putting into effect a pre-arranged plan for the forcible disarmament of Italian forces, codenamed Operation Achse. They invaded Rome, capital of their former ally. The Italians resisted. Giglio took part in the fighting, leading both his own soldiers and armed civilians, at Porta San Paolo. On 10 September, the Germans occupied Rome.

	On 17 September, Giglio left Rome with the intention of offering his military services to the Allies. On 4 October, he managed to pass through the fighting line and to contact an American patrol near Benevento (210 km (130 mi) from Rome). On 7 October, he arrived in Naples; where he was debriefed by the American Office of Strategic Services (OSS), who saw his potential as a secret agent. After a short period of training, on 28 October he passed through the lines in the reverse direction, equipped with a radio transmitter, a cipher book, and the code name "Cervo" (Italian for "deer").


https://archive.org/stream/in.ernet.dli.2015.461206/2015.461206.A-Spy_djvu.txt
	The police officer, once I was capable of looking beyond his uniform, I saw to be a pale but sturdy young man in his twenties, called Maurizio Giglio, with the code name of “Cervo” or stag; it was he, I gathered, who had brought the Vittoria radio up from Naples and now took care of moving it about.

	...Of the lot, the only one I trusted immediately was Franco, and possibly Cervo, the policeman, for he sided openly with Franco. 

	Despite my misgivings it was time to get down to business; so I informed them there was to be an Allied landing somewhere along the coast, but that for security reasons I could not tell them the exact time or location other than that we would have to act quickly if we were to be of serious assistance to the landing, either through paramilitary operations, sabotage, the saving of installations mined by the Germans, or the gathering of intelligence. 


https://books.google.com/books?id=4Y5PDAAAQBAJ&pg=PA128&lpg=PA128
	Two days after the landing, the OSS agent Peter Tompkins came to Rome to establish radio contact between the Resistance and the Allies: "The order was to prepare the insurrection


https://archive.org/stream/in.ernet.dli.2015.461206/2015.461206.A-Spy_djvu.txt
	...Since that wasted opportunity in 1943 the Italian armed forces had crumbled into civilian life or into the ranks of Mussolini’s neo-Fascist army under General Graziani, and little or nothing had been done in the way of serious partisan activities or sabotage behind the German lines.

	Having agreed to the essential meeting for the next day I could see from the fading light that my first day in Rome was coming to an end. Topolino offered to put me up, saying he had a room and a pair of pajamas that might fit, but Cervo, the young policeman, interrupted with the suggestion that it would be safer for all concerned if I stayed a. his apartment. “Who,’' he asked with a smile, “would expect to find an American OSS agent in a Fascist policeman’s bed!”

	I was doubtful about making another move, especially as there were only a few" minutes before the six o’clock curfew — when all but Ger- mans and authorized personnel had to be off the blacked-out streets of Rome — and I knew that my papers were inadequate for crashing such a curfew. But I sensed a sort of undercurrent struggle between the agents, and Cervo finally convinced me by saying it would save me an extra trip the following morning when I was to ride to the meeting with the resistance leaders on the back of his policeman’s motorcycle.


https://books.google.com/books?id=83aMqklUijYC&pg=PA80&lpg=PA80
	When Allied headquarters supported Bourgion's position, Tompkins and his friend Craveri hit upon a plan. They formed a secret espionage corps to formalize OSS aid to anti-fascists of the Committees of National Liberation. This new group, the Organizazione della Resistenza Italiani (ORI), absorbed many of the group of radio operators from Royal Italian submarines lying idle in the harbor of Naples. The Craveri group remained a secret--from the Germans, from the Badoglio Government, from Colonel Huntington, and from the Corvo section at Algiers.

	Tompkins agreed to maintain and supply Craveri's agents and to infiltrate them into the north to work with the partisans in collecting and transmitting military intelligence. In return, Craveri would have the use of these men for his own political purposes


https://books.google.com/books?id=8WHDVZPscVIC&pg=PT137&lpg=PT137
	Nevertheless, Tompkins managed to get approval from his commanding officer, Colonel Ellery Huntington, long close to Donovan, to recruit and train Italians for deployment in occupied Italy as operatives of the plan. Opposition rose at once. Tompkins and Craveri had placed their projected movement precisely in the forefront of those "Leftish" registers whom Churchill himself opposed


https://books.google.com/books?id=nGLcu_QQB6cC&pg=PA166&lpg=166
	Tompkins met with Saragat and Pietro Nenni. They worked out an arrangement to make available most of their military underground in Rome for intelligence gathering purposes. The new organization headed by Malfatti, was called the Socialist Intelligence Service (SIS). ...The Socialst party was "a mass movement they had eyes and ears practically in every office, at every street corner, in the farms and villages between Rome and the beachhead ... they were organized, and their system of organization, from cell to section to center, mean not only optimum security, but established channels of communication."

	Tompkins was able to persuade the Military Front and others in the resistance to send all intelligence they obtained to the SIS. ..."There was virtually no government office in the city--from the old ministries to the municipal garbage collectors--in which we did not have a man, either a Socialist or a member of one of the partisan groups." ...Malfatti and Tompkins had an agent in the Fascist censorship office, and the Fascist counterespionage organization. ...Giglio was in a branch of the Fascist police and there was even a source in Kesselring's command.


https://books.google.com/books?id=8WHDVZPscVIC&pg=PT135&lpg=PT135
	OSS procedure at the outset, described in a recently declassified report, was to recruit local anti-Fascists from the villages along the front. Often, they were taken on in the afternoon, given need-to-know only training, and dispatched the same night with a return rendezvous for a debriefing at dawn. According to Tompkins, these incursions into German-occupied territory bordered on suicide missions. Getting caught in the act meant "shot on the spot--such being the case all too frequently"--or harsh interrogation. "We also had to be careful not to recruit those already working for a similar, perhaps more efficient German operations aimed at fingering our men to the SS."


https://books.google.com/books?id=4Y5PDAAAQBAJ&pg=PA128&lpg=PA128
	...The euphoria over the Allied landing relaxed security. "We had thought that the Allies were coming and the underground groups took risks, came in the open to do actions...And many were arrested" (Mario Fiorentini). But the Allies were held back, the Germans counterattacked, the front was stalled, and the Nazis regained control of the city.

	...The Stall at the front and the stepping up of repression caused a crisis in the Resistance. The military front was scattered. ...The intelligence work continued, but in the middle of March the Koch gang broke Peter Tompkins's group, which had been signaling German movements and directing air raids via radio. Of its members, Arrigo Paladini and Giuliano Vassalli were imprisoned and tortured at via Tasso; Luigi Mastrogiacomo and Maurizio Giglio would be killed at the Fosse Ardeatine. "Maurizio Giglio really gave his life for mine. He could heave easily saved himself, and yet he chose to be tortured, to be killed at the Fosse Ardeatine" (Peter Tompkins).


https://books.google.com/books?id=HghXabYoXfAC&pg=PA376&lpg=PA376
	Tompkins learned that Cervo, the twenty-three-year-old policeman-partisan on whose motorcycle he had frequently been transported to safety, had been betrayed. Captured by the Fascists as he tried to save Tompkin's radio transmitter, he was taken not to Via Tasso but to another torture chamber near the railroad station. Tompkins and his closest Italian collaborator, Franco, immediately planned an operation to rescue him. Then the incident of Via Rasella occured.


https://books.google.com/books?id=4Y5PDAAAQBAJ&pg=PA128&lpg=PA128
	"After the half failure of the landing at Anzio, the Allies urged the partisans to do something. This is very important. Not that I want to give the Allies the responsibility for what happened in via Rasella; but it's a fact that there was pressure from them" to attack the Germans behind the lines in occupied Rome.


https://books.google.com/books?id=nGLcu_QQB6cC&pg=PA216&lpg=PA216
	Peter Tompkins learned about the Via Rasella attack that evening. At first he thought that there was no point to the attack. "Why hadn't whoever was responsible for the attack risked his courage against Via Tasso, or picked off Kappler and his gang of butchers? Now there was no telling what the German action might be; certainly it boded no good for the underground in the city. What saddened us even more was to contemplate the beauty and precision of the attack and the organization of which appeared to have been damned near perfect."


https://books.google.com/books?id=4Y5PDAAAQBAJ&pg=PA134&lpg=PA134
	Franca Calamendrei took off his cap: it was the signal to light the fuse.

	...As they came up the street, the Germans again started to sing; children followed after them. Liana Gigliozzi recalls "...'Go away, children,' they told us. Somebody pushed me, they threw us, my brother and me, into a shoemaker's shop" around the corner.

	...Halfway up via Rasella, another child was not as lucky. Probably, while Bentivegna was walking away toward via Quattro Fontane (with his back to the cart), 11-year old Piero Zucheretti turned the corner of via del Boccaccio close to where the cart stood. His body would be found in pieces, next to another body that was never identified, either another victim of the bomb or the random fire of the Germans.

	..."At gunpoint, they lined us up all the way to via Quattro Fontane in front of Palazzo Barberini," says Guido Mariti; "Kapper told us: 'Comrades kaputt, you kaputt.' But he also told us that we would be freed if the perpetrator of the attack had come out." No one else remembers any such words, nor did Kappler ever claim that he said them ...The other prisoners remember only shouts, orders and threats; other witnesses saw men beaten with rifle butts, women grabbed and hit with fists by German troopers and high-ranking officers.


https://books.google.com/books?id=nGLcu_QQB6cC&pg=PA216&lpg=PA216
	Shouldn't Tompkins have attempted to attack the Pensione Oltremare? Tompkins came to this realization on the March 23 too late to save Giglio and the others. There was the possibility of using the apartment directly below Koch's prison. Dynamite could have been planted that would "collapse the floor of the apartment above. In the ensuing confusion we would stand a better chance of overcoming the guards and freeing prisoners." That opportunity would not present itself again. Jane Scrivener's diary entry of March 23 was written with a sense of foreboding: "No one know what the consequences will be, nor what horrible reprisals will follow."


https://archive.org/stream/insideromewithge007032mbp/insideromewithge007032mbp_djvu.txt
	Thursday March 23rd

	...At half past three this afternoon, while a detachment of German troops was passing down Via Rasella, a time bomb which had been concealed in a dustman's cart exploded. Twenty-six Germans were killed and about twenty wounded; eight of them so seriously that they died shortly afterward. Pandemonium followed. Until 9 P.M. German sol- diers, S.S. men and Fascists with tanks and machine guns, con- tinued shooting wildly at the windows and roofs of houses not only in Via Rasella, but in the neighbouring streets also, All the inhabitants of Via Rasella as well as those who happened to be passing at the time were arrested, hustled into lorries and taken to what is now called "the slaughter house" at Via Tasso, the Gestapo prison and place of torture.

	No one knows what the consequences of this will be, nor what horrible reprisals will follow.

	Friday March 24th

	Another turn of the screw by the Germans. With explanations how it is absolutely necessary on account of the numbers of refugees in the city, how a more even distribution of avail- able supplies will thus be made, and that it is just for the time being, the already meagre ration of bread, 150 grammes, as from Saturday, the 25th, will be reduced to 100 grammes per head, per day. 

	...This evening the Qsservatore Romano appealed to all Romans to refrain from acts of violence in this most serious period of the war; acts, it says, which would only provoke severe reprisals, giving rise to an infinite series of painful episodes. It concludes by begging the clergy and all those who can influence the people to persuade them to be strong, patient and self-controlled, for their own sakes and for that of their city.

	The writer of this short appeal (published on the front page in italics) must already know something of the consequences of yesterday's occurrences in Via Rasella. Perhaps we shall know tomorrow.

	Saturday March 25th 

	Yes, we do know not only something but a great deal about the consequences of what happened in Via Rasella. Comment is superfluous. The story is a terrible one. No allusion has been made to it in the German-controlled press, but we have had all the facts from a trustworthy source. 

	At 2 o'clock yesterday the Gernians went to the prison of Regina Coeli, and called a long list of prisoners from the "third wing"; that is, the political wards. Some had been there for months, some for a few days; their only crime was that of being anti-Fascists. "With their hands tied behind their backs they were taken by lorry to some caves on the Via Ardeatina known as the Caves of Domitilla, as they are near the catacomb of that name. The Germans surrounded them with machine guns and tanks, and when at 3 o'clock the lorries drove up, the men in them were forced to alight and enter the caves. Once inside they were made to stand in groups of ten, and were machine- gunned. They were killed like cattle, with no priest present to help them at the end, no opportunity of communicating with their families. The bodies were piled in a long mound in the cave, and a mine was exploded at the entrance so that there could be no access to it. A priest and a few peasants, hidden in a neighbouring cottage which the Germans omitted to search, witnessed the proceedings. 

	Today's papers publish a communique from the German High Command which runs: 

		On the afternoon of March 23rd, criminal elements committed acts of violence by means of bombs against a German column passing through Via Rasella. In . consequence, thirty-two members of the German police were killed and a number of them wounded. 

		This brutally violent act was committed by communists of Badoglio's party. Investigations are being made as to the crime being caused by Anglo-American influence. 


https://books.google.com/books?id=HghXabYoXfAC&pg=PA376&lpg=PA376
	On the twenty-fifth Tompkins heard the romor that 320 hostages had been shot. Shortly afterward Franco arrived to tell him that one of the dead within the caves at Via Adeatina was certainly Cervo. From Cervo's orderly, who had "miraculously" escaped, Tompkins and Franco receieved a detailed report of the prolonged tortures Cervo had endured before being carried away to what could only have been a welcome death. He remained silent to the end.


https://archive.org/stream/in.ernet.dli.2015.461206/2015.461206.A-Spy_djvu.txt
	Upstairs, just as I was putting on the water for some tea. Franco arrived — bereft of his usual smile. 

	“Hello,” he said, not at all in his usual voice: then enunciated slowly: “They have shot Cervo. And eleven of our men.” 

	Only then did I notice how pale he was and that there were small bloodshot veins in his eyes. 

	“We will kill a lot of guilty Fascists,” he said, gripping my arm. 

	I nodded. “All who are guilty,” I said. But for some reason I could not feel sad or depressed, as if my emotions had been novocained. I was a little scared, but more than anything — horrible as it may seem upon analysis — relieved. Cervo’s death appeared to me to be a release for him from what must have been almost unbearable torture, for us from the constant fear that he might not be able to refrain from giving us away; and behind all this was the warm, glowing realization that a human being had achieved one of the highest peaks within his limits. 

	“How do you know?” was all I could bring myself to say. 






https://books.google.com/books?id=HghXabYoXfAC&pg=PA376&lpg=PA376&dq=tompkins+%22via+rasella%22&source=bl&ots=pF4DbwLann&sig=dAKrWsNFA51V1DvqM0hrzelwFEM&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwje4IaVi_baAhXDnOAKHfioCXEQ6AEIODAD#v=onepage&q=tompkins%20%22via%20rasella%22&f=false


https://archive.org/stream/insideromewithge007032mbp/insideromewithge007032mbp_djvu.txt

https://translate.google.com/translate?hl=en&sl=it&u=https://books.google.com/books/about/Via_Rasella.html%3Fid%3DZtUWAQAAIAAJ&prev=search


https://newrepublic.com/article/67468/resistances
	One wonders what the point of the massive executions was, considering that afterward the German High Command made only a brief announcement. In any case, there was not much resistance activity in Rome in the few weeks left before the arrival of American and other Allied troops. Note also that the entire tragedy might have been avoided by a rapid American advance on Rome. In January, 1944, when the Allies landed at Anzio, a bare thirty miles from Rome, they took the Germans so much by surprise that a single American jeep carrying a lieutenant and a driver easily made it into the capital and returned unscathed. Katz quotes Kesselring's chief of staff, General Siegfried Westphal, who later wrote that, for the Germans, this was a "breathtaking situation" in which "no one could have stopped a bold advance guard entering the Holy City." But the American commanders hesitated, and Kesselring rallied enough troops to counterattack.


https://books.google.com/books?id=4Y5PDAAAQBAJ&pg=PA128&lpg=PA128&dq=tompkins+%22via+rasella%22+March+23&source=bl&ots=laZSUmjQNX&sig=ByDrUknY3c8HROwHhLIX-OmIb9Q&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwj11ueCjfbaAhXMSt8KHY5gAxIQ6AEITDAI#v=onepage&q=tompkins%20%22via%20rasella%22%20March%2023&f=false




------


why not rescue Cervo? Why did he get captured in the first place? Why attack random German soldiers instead of rescue when Cervo and others had been captured? Why did Germans execute the prisoners when they had nothing to do with the bombing?


Tompkins book suggest he's close to Cervo and Tompkins said to be reckless, so one guess is Tompkins told him something and he knew to much


https://books.google.com/books?id=8WHDVZPscVIC&pg=PT194&lpg=PT194&dq=Tompkins+rescue+Cervo+OR+Giglio&source=bl&ots=hlx7SDJIb1&sig=awBRAtQoR0xZhEdjqUG8V_qhqss&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwiEnPaQy_baAhXhlOAKHS5-CB4Q6AEIMDAB#v=onepage&q=Tompkins%20rescue%20Cervo%20OR%20Giglio&f=false
	Although drawn to the younger men, Giglio and Malfati--like him, both in their early twenties--Tompkins had to overcome strong misgivings to reveal to any of them that within hours there was to be an Allied landing. First, he declared that he was under the personal orders of General Donovan and, as such, was the chief of the OSS in Rome.


assuming collaboration, executions in general would be to clear out people who knew to much, hard to say what exactly would be worried about with Cervo, but intimate knowledge of details of what Tompkins did would be one thing


https://archive.org/stream/in.ernet.dli.2015.461206/2015.461206.A-Spy_djvu.txt
	Furthermore, to perfect our security, there 
	should be certain places that each of us knew, but none that all of us 
	knew, so that, depending on who was caught, the survivors might have 
	a safe refuge and means of communication with the Allies. Of this 
	wc had a hard time convincing Cervo, who could not seem to under- 
	stand that there were things it was better he know nothing about, for 
	his own peace of mind as well as for ours. 1 suppose Franco, with 
	his political background, and I with the burnings I had received in 
	North Africa and southern Italy, owning to poor security among the 
	Allies, were instinctively inclined to overprecisc security, whereas Cervo, though courageous and loyal, seemed childishly brash in such 
	matters, seeming to think that if there was something we did not tell 
	him it was an indication we did not trust him. He could not under- 
	stand, though I tried desperately to convince him, that there were 
	things 1 told Franco that I did not tell Cervo, and things 1 told him 
	I did not tell Franco; that for there to be security each man should do 
	his own job and try to know as little as possible about everyone else, 
	or how they operated, because what you didn't know you couldn’t tell. 


	...As we discussed how' best to give assistance on the spot to such a 
	raid, the bell rang six times and Cervo came in in his usual excited 
	manner. 

	I was annoyed by his unexpected visit (they were becoming too fre- 
	quent for security, and his presence made Maria nervous), but this 
	time Cervo had some really w'orth-whilc problems to discuss.

	...At the usual place, by the Antici Mattei, instead of Cervo’s Topo- 
	lino as I had expected, Cervo was waiting with the old familiar motor- 
	cycle, and 1 thought to myself as I climbed on behind him, How many 
	more times will 1 have to ride this contraption before wc are through, 
	one way or the other? 


	...But though I went to sleep pleasantly, i was roused by a pounding 
	on the secret hatch — always a frightening experience, especially that 
	early in the morning. 

	It was Cervo. 'The Vittoria operator hasn’t been seen since last 
	night,” he explained all in one breath. “We’re worried something has 
	happened to him.” 

	“How the devil,” I asked, “could anything happen to him if he’s 
	been sitting in his apartment as ordered?” 


that's a good question...


	...Later in the evening Franco came in and I was so pleased to see 
	him 1 brought out the last bottle of gin from our makeshift cellar and 
	mixed some really stupendous martinis. As Maria was a little late 
	w'ith dinner we decided - o play a proper rubber of bridge — Baldo, Lele, 
	Franco and I. 

	Picking up a hand with a mess of hearts, I was about to bid when 
	the phone rang. Wc listened, ca^ds in hand, foi the four calls. It was 
	not a conventional ring, so we let it go. It continued, however, so per- 
	sistently that Maria, who had come up from the kitchen, picked up 
	the whole phone on its long extension and moved it through the door 
	into the big living room. Still it continued to ring. Finally, with a 
	frown. I nodded to Maria to answer. There was a pause, then she 
	poked her head round the door with a surprised look on her face. ’The 
	sister wants to know if 1 have bought her any honey! What shall 1 say?” 

	“Say that you will let her know,” J answered. 

	Maria did so, and hung up; but the others must have sensed that*" 
	something was wrong. They were all staring ai me apprehensively. 

	"They’ve got Cervo,” I said. “That was the conventional phrase.” 

	Immediately we began to clear the card table, remove the glasses, 
	put everything in order. 

	“But it can’t be anything,” said Maria. “The sister’s voice was so 
	calm and natural.” 

	“Perhaps it isn’t anything serious,” I answered. Then I began to 
	wonder if Cervo might have misunderstood the conventional phrase 
	and thought he was to mention the honey if everything were all right, 
	not if something were wrong. 

	I said so to the others, and it seemed to cheer them up. Then the 
	phone rang again, two and two — the danger signal — followed by 
	silence. 

	Looking around I saw that the others looked as frightened as I felt. 
	Franco glanced at his watch, and so did I. It was well past the curfew 
	hour. Debating what to do we went about systematically collecting and 
	burning and obliterating all evidence of our presence in the apartment. 

	There was no longer any doubt in our minds that something had 
	happened to Cervo, and there would be no way of knowing whether he 
	could resist under torture, and if so, for how long. In any case his 
	sister had the phone number of our apartment and through it our 
	address could be traced. We would have to get out, and fast.


	...It was almost dark, time for the curfew, when Franco arrived, 
	looking very perturbed. 

	“It’s bad,” he said, then took my arm. “Promise me one thing. 
	When the Allies come, don’t ever let them send such people behind 
	the lines again. Such swine! You know' what happened? That filthy 
	operator took the police to the spot where the radio was hidden on 
	the river boat and set a trap for Cervo. The operator squealed to save 
	himself. The rat^ As if they won’t shoot him just the same. . . . And 
	now poor Cervo’s caught!” 


	...As everyone sat round the fire I opened the first of four bottles of 
	good English gin wisely produced by Franco from his comucopial 
	brief case. Though we had nothing to mix with it we unanimously 
	proclaimed it good enough to be taken straight. To ease my nervous 
	tension and block out the thought of Cervo I led the way by drinking 
	a couple of long straight draughts.


	...It was a sunny Sunday afternoon — March 19, to be exact — as 
	Baldo and I walked along Via Panama toward Via Salaria, the air 
	faintly rcsincd by the tall umbrella pines, the streets crowded with 
	people, enjoying, or pretending to enjoy, those few hours of enforced 
	leisure, undisturbed by the manhunts of the Germans and the raids of 
	Allied planes. 

	As the clean fresh air cut through the mists of my hangover 1 was 
	able, for the first time since Franco had told me that Cervo had defi- 
	nitely been caught, to think about our problem. Did the Germans 
	have him? Or the Italians? And if so, where? Before any definite plans 
	could be made the answers to these questions would have to be 
	obtained. 


	...	As we sat there at a marble-topped table, watching the light begin 
	to fade, I felt more frightened and hopeless — despite the good white 
	wine — than I had ever before, and could not keep it out of my mind 
	that poor Cervo was caught, that the combined Italian and German 
	police would soon be scouring the city for us. The terror of being 
	hunted and the knowledge that if you are caught you will be horribly 
	tortured, perhaps for days, is a most unpleasant sensation. A specific 
	job, no matter how dangerous, can be worked up to, and the terror 
	mitigated by action and the knowledge that there will be an end, one 
	way or the other. But being hunted, with nothing you can do about 
	it, except jump at every sound, suspect everyone who looks at you, 
	and feel trapped no matter where you are, is a slow, steady form of 
	torture, worthy of the most fiendish of inventors. To cap it, the thought 
	that the Allies would not arrive for weeks, and that the torture, at 
	best, would drag on without respite, made the whole thing almost un- 
	bearable. 


	...The next day’s problems were finding out, if possible, the details 
	of Cervo’s capture, seeing whether the police had raided the Palazzo 
	Lovalelli, or Baldo’s apartment, and if Maria could find us some sort 
	of refuge for the coming night. 


	...Looking at my watch, and seeing that I still had an hour to wait 
	before my appointment, I decided that any risk was better in the dark 
	than on the open streets. People were moving round to better seats 
	or making for the exits. As we got to our former seats the sailor sud- 
	denly handed me my brief case, saying goodbye, that he had to leave. 1 
	was surprised but relieved. Now the film began to get on my nerves, 
	its familiar seenes mingling incongruously with images of the last 
	few days’ events and fantasies of what was happening to Cervo. 

	Then someone stood beside me. 

	I did not dare turn to look, but sat frozen, too terrified to tremble. 
	Whoever it was stood equally still. Even my imagination stopped. Then 
	I saw the shadow edging forward, dark Homburg, well cut dark blue 
	coat, unmistakably Cervo’s father. In my mind I unraveled the leason: 
	he had guaranteed to turn me over to the police if they would spare his 
	son. I wasn’t the least surprised he had tracked me to the theater; it had 
	been his specialty for twenty years, and this time the incentive was 
	clearly stronger. As he did not move, and I dared not turn my face 
	and thus reveal my features by the light of the screen, I sat immobile. 
	And still he did not budge. 

	Could he possibly miss me, nearsighted, unaccustomed to the dark- 
	ness? It was getting time for my appointment with the others. 11 I 
	were to miss them they would never find me, or I them. There 'was 
	nothing for it but to take the risk. With my heart in my mouth, I stood 
	up, ostentatiously blew my nose so as to cover my face, moved 
	rapidly toward the exit. 1 was sure now that the police were waiting for 
	me at the door, gun> pointed, car ready, and 1 hoped, though there 
	was little chance of it, they would fire on sight instead of carting me 
	off to endless torture.



Tompkins had met Cervo's father before. If Cervo's father was with the police, and Cervo was captured, why didn't they make the conenction and arrest Tompkins?


	...As I smiled, a little wryly, I managed at last to ask the question 
	that was weighing on my mind — and the one that had obviously 
	prompted their sortie: “What about Cervo?" 

	Franco shook his head. “He's not at Via Tasso. But we have some 
	news." 

	Franco then described how he u arranged a meeting between Maria 
	and Cervo’s sister in a nearby church which he had had surrounded 
	by plenty of guns. Maria had arrived dressed in mourning, heavily 
	veiled, Cervo’s sister had managed to come without being followed. In 
	a dark comer they had exchanged a few words. From Cervo’s sister 
	Maria learned that a police commissioner had phoned Cervo’s home 
	to say that Cervo was all right, and on duty out of town. The family 
	hadn’t fallen for this though, suspecting it to be a trick. Later they 
	had received a message in Cervo’s writing asking for bread and honey 
	and cigarettes. But as we all know he doesn’t smoke, and honey was 
	the conventional word through which we learned of his capture, the 
	family assumed the message to be a warning of danger. After that, 
	nothing more. Finally, Franco added, Cervo’s fiancee had left for 
	Bologna to see if she could get his father to help. 

	We were just then passing the moving picture theater where I 
	had spent the afternoon and 1 now wondered if the man I had seen 
	was really Cervo’s father, or just some figment of an overwrought 
	imagination! 

	One thing in Franco’s story appeared to be greatly in our favor. It 
	looked as if Cervo had been captured by an Italian counterpartisan 
	gang and that the Germans weren't yet in on the affair. It so, we might 
	stand a chance of organizing a rescuing raid. But for this we would 
	have to discover exactly where he was being held, and how h#avily he 
	was guarded. 


If they had a spy high up in police, why weren't they able to find out where Cervo was being held?


	...When it was time for her to go I held her hand tightly, kissed her on 
	the cheek and led her quickly to the door. She had been extremely 
	brave these last few days of trouble, but the strain was beginning to be 
	too much for her high-strung nature, and I realized that Franco had 
	not been exaggerating when he had said that after her meeting in the 
	church with Cervo’s sister she had danced through the streets half 
	laughing, half crying, uttering uncoordinated phrases, trying to buy a 
	horse and buggy and a bunch of flowers. 


	...But that, sad as it was, was not all the bad news of the day. We received more details of Cervo’s imprisonment thanks to the appear- 
	ance of a young boy at the home of Cervo’s parents. The boy had been 
	arrested with an old professor, blindfolded and taken to a strange 
	apartment full of frightful men and women. There he had heard people 
	howl and scream and had seen Cervo stripped of his lieutenant’s in- 
	signia, his face badly bruised and beaten, minus several teeth. He also 
	reported having seen Cervo’s orderly with him and that he too had 
	been beaten. The boy said that Cervo had begged him — ^were he to 
	manage to escape or be released — to go to his family. 

	Cervo’s mother and sister were afraid, however, that it might be a 
	trap; and we were inclined to agree. From the description of the 
	place we figured that poor Cervo must have fallen into the hands of 
	another bunch of brutes like Bardi and Pollastrini, the organizers of a 
	Fascist torture chamber in the Palazzo Braschi which had been 
	broken up as being too awful even for the Germans. 

	It was a relief though to know, pretty well for certain, that the Ger- 
	mans, as yet, had nothing to do with Cervo’s arrest, and that once 
	Franco’s men had carefully rcconnoitered the place we might pro- 
	ceed with our next operation of attempting to get him otit with an 
	armed coup de main. 


Big question of whole thing is why didn't Tompkins rescue Cervo? Despite intel capabilities, Tompkins says he concluded Cervo was in the wrong place or wasn't sure.

Tompkins got intel on Cervo's wherabouts March 22, writes in memiors inclined to agree it was a trap and concluded German's had nothing to do with his arrest.


	...The next morning, March 23, Franco reported that bis men had 
	located the place where Cervo was being kept a prisoner — an apart- 
	ment in a dismal gray building in one of the ugliest parts of Rome near 
	the Termini Station: Via Principe Amedeo 2. Since his men had been 
	watching they had seen what appeared to be three corpses taken from 
	the building, and neighbors complained of frightful screams and gun- 
	fire late into the night. 

	About a dozen men, well aimed with submachine guns, were re- 
	ported in and out of the apartment; to make a frontal assault would 
	be costly and almost certainly useless. Yet something must be done, 
	and soon, to liberate Cervo. 

	Finally we decided that if at any time there were less than fifteen 
	men in the apartment we would attempt a direct assault. Both Franco 
	and 1 felt we owed it to Cervo to be there personally when we tried to 
	pull it off. Meanwhile Franco had requested his men to discover what 
	was in the apartment immediately below the one in which Cervo was 
	being held. 

	Primo had managed to see Cervo’s sister (they lived almost across 
	the street) without being followed and had recovered four hundred 
	thousand lire from the runds hidden in Cervo’s house; with this we 
	could now pay the men ot the information service, who had been with- 
	out funds for se\cral days and in immediate danger of being picked up 
	by the police. 


According to Tompkins, got more intel morning of March 23 and convinced of Cervo's location. Tompkins writes a the place was guarded by "about a dozen men ... with submachine guns" and that a frontal assault would be costly and useless. But "finally decided" would attack if < 15 men (or I guess a different way, mentions scouting under apartment).

some of this doesn't add up -- in Tomkin's novella of his time in Rome, after Cervo capture a lot of ink on how worried if Cervo would give up their location, anxiety and moving around, cancelling things, afraid of capture. Then when he gets intel on Cervo first says "must be a trap" and then "it's too costly."


	In the evening, as 1 sat on the terrace watching the first of the swal- 
	lows, Lelc came rushing in, out of breath. Someone had thrown a 
	bomb or a series of bombs in a side street called Via Rasella (a narrow 
	street running steeply down from the Palazzo Barberini to the end of 
	the Traforo tunnel) and had killed about thirty German MPs. The 
	whole area was in a turmoil. German police and Fascists had opened 
	fire, and it was rumored that as many as 200 civilians had been in- 
	jured or killed in the shootings. The Fascists had then gone from 
	house to house beating anyone they could lay hands on, arresting all 
	men in the area, lining them up along the walls of buildings with their 
	arms above their heads, carting them off to jail irrespective of identity. 

	Our first reaction was that there was no point in killing thirty non- 
	descript German MPs! Why hadn’t whoever was responsible for the 
	attack risked his courage against Via Tasso, or picked off Kappler and 
	his gang of butchers? Now there was no telling what the German re- 
	action might be; certainly it boded no good for the underground in 
	the city. What saddened us even more was to contemplate the beauty 
	and precision of the attack the organization of which appeared to have 
	been damned near perfect! 

	The next afternoon, March 24, Franco had scheduled another of 
	our incongruous pastimes: a tea party at Baldo’s with the girls whom 
	we had invited the night of SS Captain Pricbke’s arrival. The purpose 
	of the party was to establish whether it was safe to reoccupy Baldo’s 
	flat, and to convince the superintendent of our purpose for doing so. 

	As usual I didn't feel like leaving the comfort and apparent security 
	of the flat 1 was in, but Franco insisted. So we set off about four in the 
	afternoon, loaded with good French brandy and a couple of dozen 
	pastries. Owing to the attack on Via Rasella there was a^rumor the 
	curfew had been advanced to 4 p.m. But there were still people on the 
	streets and we walked through Parioli undisturbed. 

	At Baldo’s I lit a lire with the only wood available; stray bits of 
	furniture and a washboard. The girls arrived and w^e sat around the 
	fire consuming tea and cakes and brandy. Soon 1 began to forget the 
	realities of the w^orld outside and enjoy the company of the girls, 
	especially the one called L., with whom 1 had been to fetch Captain 
	Priebkc, and who was now eyeing me curiously. 

	By seven o'clock, the proper curfew hour, we had perforce to part. I 
	was unwilling to, and Baldo and I decided to walk L. home — a risk we 
	should not have taken, but w^hich, with the aid of so much brandy so 
	early in the evening, I managed almost to enjoy.

	When at last we regained our own flat we discovered that the Ger- 
	mans had threatened to shoot three hundred hostages, ten for cuch 
	German soldier killed at Via Rasella the previous afternoon. Accord- 
	ing to rumor, there were 150 men available in the main jail and they 
	intended to take the rest wherever they could find them.

	From Sensi, the good Swiss nurse, we obtained, along with the latest 
	rumor, a small roast beef, which we washed down with a bottle of good 
	red wine while heatedly discussing the most effective way to get Cervo 
	out of the hands of the brigands who were holding him prisoner. 


	According to Franco's latest reports there were seldom less than 
	fifteen well-armed guards in or around the apartment at Via Principe 
	Amedeo 2, but one of Franco's men had discovered the apartment 
	beneath it to be empty. Franco had therefore planned for a partisan 
	locksmith to go there the next day, make an entry, and plant enough 
	dynamite to collapse the floor of the hall of the apartment above. In the 
	ensuing confusion we would stand a better chance of overcoming the 
	guards and freeing the prisoners. 

	The next morning, March 25, 1 had a hangover from the brandy 
	and good red wine; to ease it I drank several glasses of that appetizing 
	but nauseatingly labeled Roman beverage known as Acqua Marcia — 
	or Rotten Water. In the light of day, and without benefit of exhilarating 
	brandv, the operation to free Cervo seemed more problematical; 
	nevertheless it was the best that w’e could hope for. Franco w'as to 
	bring news of the hour and final disposition for the raid we were to 
	itage. 

	Late in the afternoon Lcle arrived with a rare delicacy: a pork 
	chop! — followed shortly by Maria with a small bunch ot flowers and 
	news of her own adventures during the last few days. 

	Still there was no sign of Franco. 

	Suddenly a fuse blew' and 1 was obliged to go down to the cellar, 
	where, with one of the refugees who lived on the giound floor, a lanky 
	fellow with a bastard hu iting dog, but a firsl-aitc electrician, we man- 
	aged to remedy the delect in one of the most prehistoric lighting sys- 
	tems ever installed in the twentieth century. 

	As we worked he informed nu he had just heard from the maid of 
	the bombed-out police commissioner who lived on the floor below us 
	the latest information on Via Rasella. 

	It was the first J had heard of any such person living below' us, and 
	my blood ran cold at the thought, only to be chilled even further as 1 
	heard the rumor that 320 hostages had been shot the previous after- 
	noon for the death of the thirty-two Germans killed at Via Rasella. 

	Upstairs, just as 1 was putting on the water for some tea. Franco 

	arrived — ^bereft of his usual smile. 

	“Hello,” he said, not at aU in his usual voice: then enunciated 

	slowly: “They have shot Cervo. And eleven of our men.” 

	Only then did I notice how pale he was and that there were small 
	bloodshot veins in his eyes. 

	“We will kill a lot of guilty Fascists,” he said, gripping my arm. 

	I nodded. “All who are guilty,” I said. But for some reason I 
	could not feci sad oi depressed, as if my emotions had been novo- 
	cained. 1 was a little scared, but more than anything — horiible as it 
	may seem upon analysis — relieved. Cervo’s death appeared to me to 
	be a release for him from what must have been almost unbearable tor> 
	ture, for us from the constant fear that he might not be able to refrain 
	from giving us away; and behind all this was the warm, glowing reali- 
	zation that a human being had achieved one of the highest peaks 
	within his limits. 

	“How do you know'?” was all T could bring myself to say. 

	Then Franco told me that a degraded lieutenant of the PS (Security 
	Police) had been seen at Regina Cocli too weak and too battered to 
	stand alone, and that he had been carried away with the others. 

	Having cleaned out Via Tasso the Germans had gone to Regina 
	Coeli and asked for 250 more men at random. Neither the prisoners 
	nor some of the authorities apparently knew that the merf were to be 
	shot, thinking they were to be taken to forced labor. Some asked to 
	take their canteen cups and blankets, and it w^as not till they were 
	loaded onto trucks, hands tied, wiih the Germans holding tommy guns 
	to their ribs that they realized what was in store for them. Some tried 
	to jump from the tiucks, but too late. They were rushed out to some 
	catacombs near San Callisto w'here they were thrown at random into 
	one of the caves and shot individually in the back of the neck, the living 
	climbing higher on the pile of dead. And when the dead and wounded 
	lay in a vast heap, the Germans exploded half a dozen mines, burying 
	the living and the dead under the collapsing cave. 

	Only later, from Cervo's orderly, w^ho was arrested with him but 
	miraculously escaped execution, we got the following full report of 
	what had happened to C ervo since the day, a week earlier, when he 
	had rushed out of the “hole” to move the radio by the river.



big question of all this is: why didn't Tompkins rescue Cervo, especially after Via Rasella?


"The girls arrived and w^e sat around the fire consuming tea and cakes and brandy. Soon 1 began to forget the  realities of the w^orld outside and enjoy the company of the girls" 

"According to Franco's latest reports there were seldom less than fifteen well-armed guards in or around the apartment"

"The next morning, March 25, 1 had a hangover from the brandy 	and good red wine; to ease it I drank several glasses of that appetizing but nauseatingly labeled Roman beverage known as Acqua Marcia — or Rotten Water. In the light of day, and without benefit of exhilarating 	brandv, the operation to free Cervo seemed more problematical"

"Suddenly a fuse blew' and 1 was obliged to go down to the cellar, 	where, with one of the refugees who lived on the giound floor, a lanky 	fellow with a bastard hu iting dog, but a firsl-aitc electrician, we man- 	aged to remedy the delect in one of the most prehistoric lighting sys- 	tems ever installed in the twentieth century. "


his alibi: cakes, brandy, and girls made him forget, "seldeom less than fifteen" guards, hangover next morning, no "exhilerating brandy", had to change a lightbulb

reminiscent of: https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/If_I_Did_It


Tompkins gloating?



should compare Tompkins to other accounts of events

https://www.cia.gov/library/center-for-the-study-of-intelligence/kent-csi/vol16no4/html/v17i1a09p_0001.htm
	I would include some others like the books of Donald Downes and Peter Tompkins with a warning about their reliability.


------


how many agents did they have in German police?


https://books.google.com/books?id=8WHDVZPscVIC&pg=PT273&lpg=PT273
	In a new but temporary hideout with a view of the Borghese Gardens, Peter Tompkins on that evening of the 22nd received his first details of the fate of Cervo. Tompkins had been on the run for nearly a week, unable to communicate with OSS headquarters, and the only further word about Certo he had in the meantime was that Cervo had been betrayed by Radio Vittoria operator Bonocore. What else Bonocore knew and had surely divulged was a frightful mystery no less than Cervo's capacity to remain silent. Changing addresses almost nightly, the American took the name of Roberto Berlingieri, a nonexistent distant cousin to a Fascist noble family. He had the handmade Capri shoes and could affect the necessary Tuscan accent, and in that guise he had a chance encounter with someone who had had direct dealings with that family--Gestapo Captain Erich Priebke.

	Luck was on Tompkin's side, however, more than he knew. With Lele, he had gone to a crowded "curfew party"--a common all-night diversion in collaborationist. circles of occupied Rome. This one was at the Parioli home of film star Laura Nucci, whom he recognized from the images of her silver-screen persona. Wrapped in furs, she lay on a sofa in a far corner of the room under the ambitious hands of a dapper SS officer. It was not until the ntext day that Tompkins learned that the SS man was Priebke, Kappler's cheif of counterespionage, and still later of his Berlingieri connections. But the American was unnerved more than once during the evening by Priebke's intense stare. In the end, Priebke did nothing more than offer Tompkins his groping hand, click his heels while bowing slightly and take his leave, walking a drunken zigzag to the door.


at party with Kappler counterspionage cheif


	...The apartment was in fact that site of what had been a dismal small hotel, the Pensione Oltremare, now refitted and refurbished as headquarters for the Special Police Unit of Pietro Koch.


"Pensione Oltremare" where Cervo held



https://www.cia.gov/library/readingroom/docs/MCCARGAR,%20JAMES_0137.pdf

pg 6

	
	SUSSKIND: "When you become an intelligence operative, a spy, are there tests? Do you take vocational tests, did you, Mr. Tompkins?"

	TOMPKINS: "No, when I started there weren't any such things. I just had to go and practice by myself. And I used both forms of disguise. At times I tried to look as inconspicuous as possible. I had glasses that weren't really for reading, but they covered by face, and I wore the worst-looking clothes I could find. At other times I passed as a playboy with Caracono clothes. I did that, actually, with the chief of the opposition, the spy catcher, the German spy-catcher in Rome, the boad of the Zigurheistdionst (?), who knew my name and knew that I was in Rome running an intelligence service; but we spent the night couching and drinking and playboying, and he never knew for a second who I was."


	...SUSSKIND: "Well, in the more recent history of spying, would our government today -- the CIA -- would they give tests, would they make an efort to find out if a man was in chracter and temperment equipped?"

	FARGO: "Already, during the war, there was a tremendous assessment center."

	TOMPKINS: "It was very funny, you know, because the general, General Donovan, somebody said to him, why don't you make up a school to test who's good and hwo isn't for spies. And he said, alright, let there be such a place. And after the war I ran across a book in Columbia Univeristy library -- it fell off the shelf -- and I opened it up, and it was a book by the psychiatrist who had stared the school. And the opening paragraph is, I had no idea how to go about this. And as a matter of fact, when I came back from five years of war almost and five months behind the lines, I couldn't leave the country again to go on another assignment without having been put through one of those tests. And I flunked it completely. I needed a word from the General to say he can go, he's alright, but I flunked all of their silly test."


	...=MIND: "Can we establish whether or not spying is a perilous, dangerous, profession, death's looming possiblility, always?" TOluttiVIS: "Yes indeed, it was in my case all the time. Ent mine became a spying operation which started off really as an iaeel/igence operation. Just before the Anzio /endings General Donovan, who used to appear on the scene whenever anything al:citing was going to happen, said he wanted an intdlligence officer in Homo to coordinate Partisan activities and Gather intelligence. But, as you know, when we landed at Anzio, ,Ceneral Lucas, who was in commend, instead of taking advantage of the surprise with which we caught the Germane, and taking eefueed to move. And then they wanted to know exactly what the Germans were doing. "Koaeoleing changed his mind when he saw we werent advanoing and started to move hie troops to Wipe out the beachhead. Then my operation turned into a classic espionage operation. Bectuee they wanted to know every single thing they could about the Germane. 33I made contact with the peop/o in Rome who could do that, which were the various parties of the Committee of . National Liberation. And we set uo an organization to watch all the 'oads, so that all German traffic to the beachhead was • watched. And then, as things developed, we found a contact right inside German headquarters. So I was ab/e to radio by secret radio to the allbs on the beachhead each time the Germans were preparing for attack, where they were Going to attack, where they were going to feint and in what strength they were Going to attack. And this was going immediately to the beachhead, an hour, two hours, throe or four timee a day, sometimes 24 hoUre before on amok, 48 hours before an attack. And we had the intelligence straight from Hitler. Hitler was planning the three major attacks on the beachhead. Finally, the one on the 16th he was personally in command, down to practically platoon level, ok how that attack was going to be launched and carried out, But all the time we were radioing this directly to the beachhead, to the allies on the other side." 

	SUBSKIND: "Was your contact within the German headquarters a German?" TOIWREINS: "Actually, to be more precise, he was an Austrian." FARAGO: "Was his name Skokholz?" T OMealaS: "I have no idea what his name was, because I worked through a young man who was half Austrian and half Italian, and whose father was Austrian before; and he had many contacts among the 2ustrians who were in the Gorman Army. And to the Germans they wore secure, but of course, they weren g t, because they remembered."

	...SUSSMD: "Well, how do you account  for  our indignation? We act so moral and upright." TIMMINS: "TO a certain extont it shouldn e t be. But  on  the otlIcr hand I firmly believe that there is good and bad spying. And  if  thaw) is any purpose to this p/anqt at  all there is a moral purpoze. Aad there is in spying too. And you can Go just so  far and play the game and succeed.  If . you go one stop too far you vitiate your gene, dispel your whole promise and that's what I  call  bad spyang. "That's what the SD of the Germans did and that's what  Canaris, as hcad of the Abuthr, triad as best as he could not to do, Eou you can say there are bad Germans *  But there are differences otatcn tha Garmans. And the difference between Canaria and Rimier and Hoydriah and the SD's was quite a noticeable diffotonco."

	=SHIED: "Boos bad spying wort?" TOMINS: "Hew you may have quick successos with it, but I think  you're  doomed to disaster in the end.


	...USSKIND: "When a spy is caught  is  It generally because of his carelessness or because of betraYal by someone?" FELIX: "It  could be either. But  in most cases It's a simple wearing down of the laws of chance, which  are operating ineeorably against him. There 'a .  a literature on the sub Joe of how long an operation can be kept going without being Caught. And Sorge, the Russian spy in Japan -- Manchuria and Japan -- ran for nine years. This  is, I  think, a record." • Parago: "That was a very interesting operation too." TOMPKINS: •"Mbbody yet knows who  be was really aping for in the end, nor what hap p ened to him, do they? They don't know whether ho o s alive today."


------


https://books.google.com/books?id=8WHDVZPscVIC&pg=PT273&lpg=PT273&dq=Tompkins++apartment+Cervo+OR+Giglio&source=bl&ots=hlx7SDKCe5&sig=0l6zszYTOyaQJI9zmRg9YyQrHDU&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwjYx9rfzPbaAhXEqlkKHcOICvwQ6AEIQzAE#v=onepage&q=Tompkins%20%20apartment%20Cervo%20OR%20Giglio&f=false
	Menicanti made an attempt to kidnap Siria and Iris and their radio. 

	...Filing his own report to the OSS only two months later, Menicanti told his side of the tale:

		At that moment, Mr. Tompkins tried in every way to hinder my efforts to find this radio operator and his set, for reasons absolutely unknown to me. He said to everyone that I was a very doubtful person, and probably a double agent, a traitor in the service of the SS. These rumors immediately created to me all sorts of difficulties and also aroused suspicion among my agents and friends, causing me to lose a great deal of time, thus preventing me from working more efficiently. I don't believe that it is interesting to the OSS to tell you in detail all the difficulties and nuisance of Mr. Tompkins' behavior against me.


what was going on here?



------


https://translate.google.com/translate?hl=en&sl=it&u=https://it.wikipedia.org/wiki/Maurizio_Giglio&prev=search
	 Maurizio Giglio was born into a family of the bourgeoisie of the capital; his father was a manager of the OVRA , the secret service of the fascist regime. He completed his high school studies at the high school grammar school Terenzio Mamiani and graduated in jurisprudence [1] . 


meetings between Tompkins and Giglio's father before and after his capture unusual



------

https://www.nytimes.com/1984/04/18/obituaries/gen-mark-w-clark-last-of-world-war-ii-commanders-dies-at-87.html


https://www.history.com/topics/world-war-ii/italian-campaign
	The Allied breakout in May 1944 exposed Kesselring’s main forces to a potential trap by advancing Allied armies from Anzio and Cassino. However, in a controversial and little-understood decision, U.S. General Mark Clark (1896-1984) contravened his orders by moving northwest to capture Rome instead of cutting off the German soldiers retreating from Cassino. His decision allowed a sizable German army to escape and possibly squandered an opportunity for a quick resolution of the grinding Italian Campaign.


how did Tompkins find out about this?


Katz "Battle for Rome" says he learned it from Donovan:

	
	Sometime between the fettuccine and a postprandial digestivo, Donovan told Tompkins of the coming invasion and also disclosed that the British had agreed that all intelligence operations in Rome be conducted under the exclusive supervision of the OSS.


http://www.americanheritage.com/content/%E2%80%9Cour-german-wehrmacht-being-stopped-shadow%E2%80%9D
	Long after the war it was revealed that Field Marshal Kesselring, upon learning of the Anzio landings, had exclaimed: “Only a miracle can save us now.” The miracle was Allied overcaution. The advantage of surprise was squandered; General Clark called off the plan to drop paratroopers, who could have prevented the movement of enemy troops against the beachhead, “lest it prematurely disclose the area of our main assault”; and Anzio settled into a stalemate as complete as Cassino. Churchill cabled Field Marshal Viscount Alexander in disgust: “I expected to see a wildcat roaring into the mountains—and what do I find? A whale wallowing on the beaches.”

	...Inevitably the Allied delay brought disillusionment and defections. On March 13 the O.S.S. learned that its security had been blown by a radio technician, “Walter”—supposedly a friend of Cervo’s—who had sold out to the Germans.


http://www.americanheritage.com/content/%E2%80%9Cour-german-wehrmacht-being-stopped-shadow%E2%80%9D
	On his way back to Washington after the Sicilian landings of July i o, 1943, General William Donovan conferred with General Mark Clark at Fifth Army headquarters in Morocco and offered to place his agency’s resources at the disposal of the Fifth Army for the coming invasion of Italy. It was decided to expand the O.S.S. functions by adding operations specialists and research experts for tactical and strategic intelligence procurement, and a special reconnaissance battalion, an O.S.S. unit reorganized on a full military basis, was assigned to the Fifth Army’s G-2, or intelligence branch. This was to be the first time that O.S.S. techniques would be employed directly by ground armies.

	...A week before Anzio, General Donovan arrived unannounced at O.S.S. headquarters in Naples, a dilapidated four-story palazzo requisitioned from an indigent Neapolitan duke. In its vast rococo rooms, radios and high explosives mingled incongruously with the duke’s gilded mirrors and heavy Victorian furniture, and the personnel feasted by candlelight on wines from their host’s cellar and fettucine made with G.I. powdered eggs. The general joined them for dinner and with instinctive courtesy insisted that Peter Tompkins, twenty-four-yearold chief of the Naples group, should preside at the head of the table. “You’re the host,” he said. “I’ll sit at your right.” Later, over coffee, he confided to Tompkins the purpose of his visit. It was expected that the coming landings at Anzio would result in an early liberation of Rome, the general explained, and he wanted someone to enter the occupied city, contact O.S.S. secret radio Vittorio , which had been operating in Rome since the previous October, and at a given signal set off sabotage and countersabotage measures to coincide with the Allied invasion. Filled with that sense of dedication that Donovan engendered in his men, Tompkins volunteered and was promptly accepted for the job. 

	...Several days passed without news of the expected Allied advance, and gradually the truth dawned on Tompkins: instead of the lightning “cat-claw thrust at the Alban Hills, General Clark’s Anglo-American forces had inexplicably decided to dig in and consolidate their defensive position on the beach against a German counterattack. 


https://www.cia.gov/library/center-for-the-study-of-intelligence/csi-publications/csi-studies/studies/spring98/OSS.html

Tompkins a fan of Clark?




------

Katz "Battle for Rome":

	Another man taken to the Koch Gang's base along with Cervo and Mastrogiacomo, the houseboat custodian, was a police orderly named Giovanni Scottu, who had been assigned to Lieutenant Giglio that day. At war’s end, Scottu gave a sworn deposition of the torture undergone by his superior and himself as well. Detailing in precise and horrific language six distinct sessions of torture between March 17 and 23, the deposition is undoubtedly the most quoted description of torture during the occupation, particularly by the many writers who have recounted Giglio’s heroic story. Documents that have recently come to light, however, cast serious doubt on the veracity of Scottu’s testimony. 9

	9 None of those writers, including English-language authors such as Tompkins, Trevelyan, Cave Brown, and myself, took note of a 1946 challenge to Scottu’s testimony by the chief judge in Koch’s trial as a war criminal. That court, questioning whether the witness was suffering from a psychiatric illness, ordered a medical examination, which proved inconclusive. But the 2000 Griner study of Koch’s Special Police Unit uncovered sealed documents showing that Scottu, although taken into custody, was never placed under arrest. Koch himself, when interrogated, declared that Scottu physically attacked and denounced Giglio for having gotten him into trouble over something he knew nothing about, and Giglio, he said, confirmed this. In any case, Koch found Scottu to have had no role in Giglio’s OSS activities and released him. Griner’s references to the original version of Scottu’s deposition further show that all of the earlier writers had worked from an altered copy from which certain improbable erotic passages had been removed (MG: 218-220, 320-321).


look into what was going on with Scottu and his testimony


	...Still far from their quota, the list-makers waded deeper into the morass of arbitrary choices. A sense of their growing desperation can be gleaned from Priebke:

		The whole of that night we searched the records and could not find a sufficient number of persons to make up the number required for the execution. So, a further search was made of the records to see if there were any persons who had not been tried, but had been arrested for being … concerned in any outrage against German troops or had been found in possession of firearms and explosives or were leaders of “ under ground” movements. These names were added to the list. Still we could no t find sufficient persons…. 3


Priebke was involved in choosing who to execute in repreisal for Via Rasella, wrote that he was trying to find people to fill a quota


	...death-penalty-case prisoner, a perfect fit for the legitimized categories but problematical nonetheless. He was twenty-six-year-old college professor Paolo Petrucci, arrested as an anti-Fascist on the word of an informer. He had just been tried by the German tribunal and, to great surprise, had been acquitted. He was due to be released that morning. Instead, his luck ran out. Kappler, adding the young professor to the others, completed the list: 320 men—rich and poor, doctors and lawyers, workers and shopkeepers, artists and artisans, teachers and students, men and teenaged boys from every walk of life, and a man of God to walk among them. By now, something resembling a life of its own had been breathed into the reprisal machine, and Kappler, as he later said, felt its autonomous throb: “At a certain moment during the night, I said, ‘By now themselves….’” 4 


anything unusual about who they did and didn't pick?


around pg 310, says some officers refused to carry out order, ended up with band of other officers carrying out the actual killings 


pg 318, Joseph Raider says he escaped cave killings in confusion when a priest broke through his chains and blessed everyone

pg 318-320 Katz sounds like a psycopath too

pg 320 says Koch was the one to provide Giglio's name

pg 321 Nazi Lieutenant Tunnat selected 10 more to be executed who had been recently cleared of charges and released from prison, said by Katz to be at random. There names were added to Caruso's list while 10 on the list were crossed off. Footnote says nine of the men who were crossed of were spared because the prison official who replaced them thought they were chosen solely as Jews (what about 10th?)

pg 322 The Nazis had a list of 330 but killed 5 extra men. This came up at the trial were Kapler blamed Priebke. The 5 extra men became a matter of public interest later and Katz says it was the subject of a cover-up by the Nazi officers.

around pg 326 Katz goes over pope not calling out Nazi massacre at Ardeatine


pg 327

	
	...But for Elena, in a certain sense, the Resistance had fallen short.

		A slaughter in reprisal had never followed any of the attacks against the Germans, but we asked ourselves how they had been able to transport such a massive number of men to the place of execution without the Resistance knowing anything about it in spite of being in a state of alert…. The Germans had rushed to murder all those hostages, hidden the bodies somehow, and left their families without a word, so that everyone would suffer the torment of not knowing whether their own loved ones were among the victims.


should look into this--it was only a few officers transporting many prisoners, and the partisans had a vast intel network, American commandos a few miles away. Should get more info on their intel network, supposedly something was declassified recently.

pg 330 Kessering claims victims were already sentenced to death, accusing pope statement blaming both sides of bias against Germans

pg 331 Malfatti told Tompkins Cervo and 12 other men from their network had been killed at Ardeatine

pg 367

	...W HEN Giuliano Vassalli, not long after the Ardeatine Caves massacre, fell into Kappler’s hands, his fellow Socialist, spymaster Franco Malfatti, took the usual precaution of dropping out of sight. He attached’himself to Peter Tompkins’s party heading for Allied territory, but the attempts at crossing the lines were leading nowhere. By the second in week in May, having tried all the points of the compass, by land and by sea, the fugitive travelers had had to retreat and were back in Rome. The situation Tompkins had hoped to resolve had taken a turn for the worse.

	The so-called skeleton organization he had left behind had been picked still cleaner by further arrests, and the effort to set up radio contact with OSS headquarters behind the lines at base appeared to be dead. Sorrentino, the bogus representative of Clark in Rome, had in the meantime reemerged but only long enough to be captured by Kappler. He would never have been sorely missed by his own side but after one night in Via Tasso, he betrayed one of Tompkins’s most trustworthy agents, the Roman Partisan Arrigo Paladini.

	Menicanti and the Allied-certified “notorious Fascist” Dr. Lima had found a new way to turn OSS operations in Rome into cash. They had begun issuing “American” documents to those who felt in need of political detoxification before facing the anti-Fascist future. For 1,000 lire, a seal of the United States would attest to the good works performed by the document holder as a freedom fighter in the anti-Nazi underground. Since the CLN, by the turnabout of Togliatti’s Communists, had wheeled to the right to accommodate Badoglio and the monarchists, many of these same born-again customers were being successfully pitched by Menicanti to add luster to their new credentials by opposing any form of insurrection when Rome changed hands. In this regard, the Rome to which Tompkins had returned was looking like the Rome Donovan had had in mind when many months back he had warned Tompkins to “just make sure they don’t rise up against each other.”

	With Tompkins a de facto castaway, the OSS in Rome had become a den of cutthroats and thieves, a travesty of what Tompkins had set out to create. The intelligence coups in the weeks following the Anzio landings had died for want of a radio. His latest and perhaps most vexing frustration was being powerless to convey the steady flow of daily German intelligence bulletins being accessed by his agent in Kesselring’s headquarters. One such bulletin had reported that six clandestine radio stations, sent behind the lines by the Fifth Army, had been infiltrated by German counterespionage and were transmitti ng false information to the Allies. A final attempt to reach OSS headquarters through the radio facilities used by a British agent Tompkins had used in the past brought news of his arrest as well.

	“The water seemed to be rising all around,” Tompkins later reported to Donovan. “Franco and I decided … [to] attempt to cross into Switzerland, as our days were definitely counted, and we had no hope of establishing contact with the base.”


Tompkins bails while things deteriorate in rome. Many of his network had been arrested, some giving up names of other collaboraters. Those worried about their fate in a future anti-Fascist Rome were able to buy forged documents saying they were faithful anti-Fasist collaboraters.

Tompkins agent in Kesselring's headquarters told him the allies were being fed misinformation by German counterintelligence in some areas, but he was unable to relay this to the allies (why?).


	That decision was altered the following day, however, when on the morning of May 12 the BBC announced the massive Allied assault on the Gustav Line. Tompkins had just received word from his man at Kesselring’s headquarters of the extent of the Germans’ surprise. They were still expecting a second attack, an amphibious landing north of Rome, and though Tompkins could only guess what the Allies were planning, this was something they had to know. The decisive spring offensive had clearly been launched; there would be precious intelligence continuously. There had to be a way to send it. He would stay in Rome to find the way.


but when the allies atacked Tompkins decided to stay in Rome and find a way to send intel


pg 372


	...Y ET the terror reigned on. On April 3, the day Socialist Partisan commander Vassalli had been arrested, Don Giuseppe Morosini, the priest who, of the two imprisoned in the Via Tasso, was not chosen by Kappler to die in the Ardeatine Caves, went before the firing squad at Fort Bravetta. It was the first execution in the ten days since the massacre, but the pace quickened, with eighteen men slated to die at the same killing ground over the next few weeks—among them Vassalli’s cousin Fabrizio Vassalli, of the Matteotti Brigades. The Socialists were to be especially hard-hit in the post-Ardeatine period, notably at the leadership level, with the arrest of the distinguished trade unionist Bruno Buozzi and the assassination of Eugenio Colorni, the head of the Party’s underground newspaper, Avanti!

	The scourge of the Roman Resistance, Kappler, had graduated from relatively innocuous police work beginnings into a stereotypical Gestapo homicidal chieftain. But he was outdone by Pietro Koch, who would rack up 435 arrests in his four months in Rome. Together, though rarely working together, they had by now all but demolished the most vigorous part of the Roman underground, despite extraordinary feats of endurance by many of their prisoners in withstanding torture.

	Kappler would always deny that he personally tortured his prisoners, and Koch would only admit to conducting interrogations patterned after what he called “the American third-degree.” 20 After the war ended it would be difficult to determine who did what to whom except in the case of Captain Erich Priebke. His years of heeling to Kappler had transported him to prominence as the subtlest and most effective grand inquisitor of the Via Tasso. His own subsequent denials might have gone further had it not been for the recent arrest of Peter Tompkins’s agent Arrigo Paladini.


the Nazis executed more, including resistance leadership, in the days following Ardeatine

Tompkin's agent Paladini was captured but survived. He gave an account of the interrogation methods of Priebke.


pg 374 The resistance, including Elena, had a plan to kill the traitor Guglielmo Blasi who was now working for Koch's group. That plan changed into a plan to kill Koch himself, but "that plan, too, ad a betrayer." Katz doesn't name the betrayer.

pg 375-376 Katz writes a love story about Paolo and Elena

pg 376-378 Katz on Clark's decision to disobey orders

p 385 resistance ends up not doing insurrection when allies advance

pg 386 kesselring abandons Rome in posible act of insubordination


pg 392


	...Alone and abandoned, the surviving prisoners remained locked in their cells, unfed and unaware of their reprieve. Three days earlier, on June 1, the Fascist authorities informed the Vatican that they were willing to release not only the five political prisoners in Regina Coeli for whom the Pope had intervened but everyone in their custody. They expressed a fear, however, that the Germans would object, and sought the Vatican’s help. Monsignor Montini recorded speaking to Weizsäcker about the matter but not the result. 23

	One possible result was that on June 2, which coincided with Pius XII’s name day—Sant’Eugenio on the church calendar—Partisan commander Giuliano Vassalli was summoned from his cell in the Via Tasso by Kappler. “You can thank the Holy Father,” Kappler told him, “that you’re not being sent to the wall, which is what you deserve, Vassalli, right?” Vassalli, who had been expecting execution, was unaware of the Pope’s intervention, but wasted no time inquiring further, when Father Pfeiffer suddenly appeared and Kappler turned him over to the papal emissary, saying, “Don’t ever let me see you again.” 24

	On the next day, however, six other Partisan prisoners, members of the monarchist Military Front, did go to the wall, taken from Regina Coeli to the firing squad at Fort Bravetta. That same evening of the 3rd, as the general retreat of the occupiers began, fourteen prisoners at the Via Tasso, their hands tied behind their backs, were put aboard a truck heading north. They were an odd mixture of men that included the trade-union leader Bruno Buozzi and three Italian operatives of the OSS: Tompkins’s agent Edmondo Di Pillo; Vincenzo Bonocore, the radio operator who had betrayed Cervo; and the self-appointed Fifth-Army representative, Enrico Sorrentino, who had sold out another Tompkins man, Arrigo Paladini. Paladini himself, suffering two broken ribs, was among those who boarded a second, larger truck crammed with about thirty prisoners in all. The truck carrying Buozzi and the others departed first, proceeding in the outward flow along the Via Cassia, but a few miles out of Rome it halted at the suburban hamlet of La Storta. The prisoners were made to descend behind some trees, forced to their knees, and one by one slain in the bullet-t o-neck manner used by Kappler in the massacre in the Ardeatine Caves. 25

	In the second truck, Paladini was in the company of the Gappisti turned in by Guglielmo Blasi, including Spartaco, Raoul, and Duilio, all of whom, like Paladini, were under a sentence of death by now and physically gutted. This truck, however, either by breakdown or sabotage, had failed to depart, and these men were again locked in their cells, this time unguarded, miraculously spared, a key-turn or a battering ram away from freedom. They did not have long to wait, for they were rescued within hours by an unruly crowd of Romans drunk on liberation air.


The pope intervened on behalf of 5 prisoners (why those 5?) but as the allies closed in the Fascists told the Vatican they would release everybody. Kappler released Giuliano Vassalli saying "you can thank the pope." The next day, June 3rd, the fascists executed 6 prisoners from the Military Front and 14 others, which included a trade-union leader, members of Tompkins's OSS, the radio operator who betrayed Cervo (Bonocore), and the 5th army rep who betrayed Paladini (Sorrentino). Paladini, Spartaco, Duilio, and others were to be taken in a second truck, but the truck failed to depart and they were left in their cells to be rescued.


pg 402

	
	...S OMEONE with a more substantive grievance on that day was Peter Tompkins. After nearly three months of being cut off behind the lines and boarded up nail by nail into isolation by the treachery of his rivals, Tompkins now found himself in a further predicament. He knew none of the OSS officers arriving with the Fifth Army. They were the newcomers of a restructured and restaffed organization. Many of his strongest supporters, who would later attest to the critical importance of his work in Rome, had been transferred to London for the Overlord invasion, and he was as much a stranger to the arriving agents as they were to him. Worse, the Menicanti group had managed to ingratiate itself at Tompkins’s expense, and when in the coming days the American would accuse them of sabotaging his operation and criminal activities, they would counter with charges that he was “completely mad.” 38

	Thus all his groundwork of recent weeks, identifying and setting in motion an apparatus for tracking down the Nazi spies purposely left behind in Rome, would be disregarded, and his efforts to secure living quarters, office space, and transportation for postliberation counterintelligence operations would be misinterpreted from the first day.


Katz says Tompkins was isolated in Rome by the treachery of his rivals. When the allies arrived, the OSS had already been restructured and restaffed and Tompkins knew none of their agents. Katz says his "strongest supporters" had been transfered to Overlord by then, and so his contributions were "misinterpreted." Tompkins got in a conflict with the Mnicanti group, him accusing them of sabotaging his operations and criminal activities and them calling him mad.


pg 411


	...Of all the crimes committed by the Nazis during the occupation (with one minor exception) only one was prosecuted. On the other hand, whatever the offense, the same perpetrators were complicit to them all, and justice for the victims heaped in the Ardeatine Caves would provide retribution. The steely prediction made by Carlo Trabucco that when the Romans would be free, a “pilgrimage without end” would go to the Fosse Ardeatine came to pass without delay. It


only Ardeatine and one other Nazi crime in rome was prosecuted

pg 412 a team was able to identify 322 of the bodies

pg 413 at the trial, the church backed Caruso, one of the ardeatine criminals. Romans were angry and stormed the courthouse, but Caruso hadn't shown up yet. Some of them (who?) ended up grabbing and kiling Donato Caretta instead, who was to testify against the criminals (what exactly happened here?). Caruso was tried and executed.

Pope helped Koch too? not sure what's going on here, Katz account of Koch's execution unusual

pg 416 some of the trials were done in Britain. There, Kappler testified against Mackensen and Malzer, and each blamed the other. They were sentenced to death, but their sentences were reduced. Mackenson was released in 1952. Kesselring was sentanced to death, but Churchill and General Alexander intervened and he was released in 1952. There were protests in Rome and a campaign to rehabilitate him, including Shelford Bidwell and Carlo D'Este.

pg 420 Kappler and Priebke went on trial in Rome, but Priebke had escaped from a prisoner-of-war camp--"a breakout that had apparently gone unnoticed for months." The court ruled that Via Rassalla was illegal and a reprisal was justified, but that Kappler's reprsal constituted a war crime. Kappler was sentanced to life without paroe but escaped with assistance in 1977.

pg 423 Sas and Franco calamandrei, who commanded the Va Rasella attack, were awarded for military valor

pg 423 Katz says questions of malfeasance by the Resistance were raised in Italy in 1994 (why?)

pg 424 around this time, Priebke was discovered in hiding in Argentina. He was arrested and extradited to Italy. He had escaped on the "Rat Line," an underground activity in the Vatican's refugee program.

pg 425 A military tribunal in Rome found him "guilty but not punishable" since he had obeyed a superior order. The decsion was protested in Italy and the Supreme Court annulled the verdict. They found evidence that the tribunal intended to absolve Priebke before the trial began. The court convened a new trial, and this time Karl Hass, and Ardeatine criminal who later worked for U.S. and Italian intelligence in the Cold War, was there to testify.

pg 426


	...No friend of his name-dropping codefendant, Hass was a star witness for the prosecution. In the Kappler trial, the court had concluded that the five men killed in the caves whose names were not on any list had been the result of a counting error, implicating list-keeper Priebke. Hass, however, now revealed the deep secret that had been covered up all these years: The Error of the Five Extra Men.

		At the Ardeatine [he testified], Priebke was there with the copy of the list. He got the people down [off the trucks] and canceled out their names. At a certain point, one of the prisoners was not on Priebke’s list. At the end, in fact, there were five extra men. That was when Kappler said, “What do I do with these five? They’ve seen it all.” I don’t know if it was Kappler himself, or Priebke, or who—I don’t believe it was Kappler—… I don’t know who killed these five people. 40

	There it was: a simple solution, yet plausible enough to withstand any challenge. First there was one, then two, and so on. One by one, they were shunted aside, watching the others enter the tunnels, hearing the shots, again and again, five at a time, made to wait and made to wonder all those bloodletting hours what their own fate might be. After all, when there was one, then two, the killers could not know how many extras they would end up with.


Hass testified that they didn't know how the five extra men got there.

pg 427 Hass and Priebke were sentenced  to life without parole but were released after 15 years of house arrest.

pg 428 in 1963 Pope Pius XII's efforts to save Jews from the Nazis were dramatically reevaluated and this involved the plays "Der Stellvertreter," "The Representative" and "The Deputy". There was a public debate involving some members of the clergy defending Pius XII. Some Vatican documents were made public, and some Vatican members said they were not everything and "edited according to exact scientific standards." Pope John Paul II tried to make Pius XII a saint and this was another point of controversy.

pg 429-433 Katz goes on about debate on Pius XII failing to oppose Nazis, seems to be a topic he cares about. He concludes that the Pope's conduct was a moral failure. (what was actually going on here?)


------

https://translate.google.com/translate?hl=en&sl=it&u=https://it.wikipedia.org/wiki/Peter_Tompkins&prev=search


Tompkins born to wealthy family in Georgia, U.S., repeatedly stayed in Rome and visited Roman aristocracy, including prince Camilllo Caetania. In the 1920s he was close friends with Carlo Sforza, the Italian Minister of Foreign Affairs 1920-1921.

In 1941, he returned to the U.S. and became a correspondentt of the New York Herald Tribune before entering the OSS. He said he wanted to work for OSS to spread democracy and that he opposed monarchist Badoglio, who was backed by Churchill.


After the war he was mostly a columnist and a writer. He wrote "a spy in rome" in 1962 and "Italy Betrayed" in 1966.


	...According to Tompkins, in fact, the latter did not understand the importance of a unitary structure such as CLN , to prevent the transformation of the Resistance to the Nazi-Fascists in an internal struggle among the anti-Fascists themselves; this intuition turned out to be unfounded and will be paid by the agent after the conflict, at the time of the transformation of the OSS into the CIA, when attempts were made to deny him the recognition he deserved for his infiltrator and saboteur action. Tompkins also confirmed this opinion later in a conference in Venice, accusing the OSS of having fought on one side the Nazi regime and on the other, rescued the fascists of the Xª MAS Flotilla under the orders of Junio ​​Valerio Borghese and the commander of the SS Karl Wolff , in addition to other Nazis. Tompkins himself was convinced that there were fascist infiltrators inside the OSS;


Tompkins got in fight with OSS/CIA after war?

interesting that he accuses OSS overall of supporting Nazis and acusess Cervo of betraying names of resistance members, I guess like projecting? His failure at Rome seems pretty clear-cut, Tompkins didn't come out clean.

	
	...in one of his last public appearances on the occasion of the celebrations for the liberation of Rome (June 4, 2006 ), the American writer and agent pointed out that the mission of the OSS that commanded during the Nazi-Fascist occupation of the Eternal City would not was possible without the collaboration of Italian Resistance women and men.


Tompkins made a public appearance in 2006 and talked about his operations in Rome in 2006

Tompkins wrote in a book in 2001 on Mussonlni's collaboration with Freemasons


------


https://books.google.com/books?id=nGLcu_QQB6cC&pg=PA243&lpg=PA243&dq=Tompkins+Menicanti&source=bl&ots=ugZk7F88oa&sig=5cVZ-Td2RgBxtThPmMEoVfcNRHg&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwiin6GglvjaAhVCu1kKHR1rDhQQ6AEILDAB#v=onepage&q=Tompkins%20Menicanti&f=false


Colonel Huntington appointed Minicanti cheif OSS agent in Italy. When Tompkins arrived he was appointed cheif OSS agent in Rome, and Tompkins clashed with Menincant. Another OSS agent, Enrico Sorentn, "claimed that he was appointed by General Mark Clark as cheif OSS agent in Rome."


https://books.google.com/books?id=nGLcu_QQB6cC&pg=PA243&lpg=PA23
	In Rome, Donavan had two competing and overlapping operations--Menicanti's and Tompkin's--with each man insisting that he was the head of the city's clandestine operations and no one at headquarters settling the dispute. Crockett reported that Menicanti was a "very rough, ruthless gangster type." Tompkins, he concluded, was courageous and sinccere, but the young man was in way over his head and "did a very sloppy job of security." Counterintellgence officers sifting through the Vittoria station wreckage concluded that the Germans knew about Tompkins before he even arrived in Rome and by March they had a god read on his activities in the city. The ridiculous-looking beard he grew as a disguise instead made him stand out in the capital city, they decided, and made it easier for the Gestapo to track him. "It seems quite probable," the OSS security men theorized in a later report, that the Germans let Tompkins roam freely so they could follow him and gather up the Italians he recruited as agents. By early spring, the Germans, in fact, had convinced four of the snitches they captured by following Tompkins to work for them as double agents. The most important turncoat in Tompkin's network turned out to be Franco Malfatti, the Socialist Party's military intelligence officer, who "betrayed OSS to the SD," the security officers reported.


After the war, an OSS investigation concluded that the Germans knew about Tompkins before he arrived, had a good read on his activities, and probably let him roam freely so they could track him and capture the agents he recruited. The Nazis recruited Franco Malfatti, a member of Tompkin's network and the Socialist Party's military intelligence officer.


Katz on Malfatti:

	...After a nap on a sofa, he made contact with two of the first-team agents recruited by Bourgoin: team leader Menicanti (code-named Coniglio), and Maurizio Giglio (Cervo), a Fascist police lieutenant in full uniform, working for the OSS as double agent. They were joined by two others, Elio Gambareri, associated with Badoglio and SIM, and Franco Malfatti, a member of the Socialist Party, who had fought against Franco in the Spanish civil war and had worked in the French underground in Nazi-occupied Paris.

	Although drawn to the younger men, Giglio and Malfatti—like him, both in their early twenties—Tompkins had to overcome strong misgivings to reveal to any of them that within hours there was to be an Allied landing. First, he declared that he was under the personal orders of General Donovan and, as such, was chief of the OSS in Rome. His authority unchallenged—though he would soon learn that Menicanti had been claiming himself to be the top OSS operative behind the enemy lines—Tompkins spoke in general terms of the impending invasion and the need to act quickly to coordinate their efforts with the Partisans.

	...Malfatti’s first report to Tompkins on the German response to the landing and the movement of troops to the beachhead contained vital information that, if true, could only have come from a mole well-burrowed in Kesselring’s headquarters. Moreover, it identified the precise units and their deployment in or on the way to the Anzio area, information, as it turned out, that anticipated what the Allies would discover on their own only days later.

	Tompkins’s immediate reaction was that Malfatti might be a double agent. “How the devil, I wondered, did Franco obtain information from German headquarters in Rome!” Was the American being lured into the role of an unwitting channel for disinformation?

	Malfatti apparently read his mind, offering an inscrutable smile. “You’ll just have to trust me,” he said. He could not reveal his sources but, he said, even in the German High Command there were men of non-German origins. Some of them were children of anti-Nazis, even Socialists, who had fought the rise of Hitler and his subsequent Anschluss with Austria, the conquest and absorption into the Third Reich of their once-independent country.


From Tompkin's book:

https://archive.org/stream/in.ernet.dli.2015.461206/2015.461206.A-Spy_djvu.txt
	Later in the afternoon Franco returned with a fresh bulletin of information: 

		The situation facing the Beachhead as reported in German Headquarters in Rome is as follows: The Neltuno landings were unopposed because the Germans were taken by surprise. Thereafter the Germans did not attempt to stop the landing operations, waiting for reinforcements, and so as not to expose themselves to fire from Allied naval units. It was first thought that the objective of the landings was a march on Rome, as a result of which German Headquarters in the city were ordered to be ready to leave. It was then noted that disembarking troops were heading south; this the Germans considered fatal to the Allies as they would be trapped between the road and the marshes, an easy target for the 90th Armored Infantry Division already on the spot, and two other forthcoming Divisions (the 29th and 3rd Panzer Grenadiers) being transferred from the southern front to the Beachhead, along with units of the Hermann Goering Panzer Division al- ready heading for the Beachhead and Albanu. 

		German Headquarters in Rome have now settled down again. 

	How the devil, I wondered, did Franco obtain information from German headquarters in Rome! Should I ask him, at such an early date, to reveal the source of such high-level information? Having pressed him, would 1 be any surer of its authenticity, or would I still be just as dependent on his word? I could not, after all, go up to German headquarters and look for myself. Was he a German double agent, and I his dupe? Was I being a channel for purposely false in- formation to delude the Allies? After all Franco had admitted having had staff training with the Germans in Austria! Suddenly I saw a whole world of evidence pointing to Franco as a German agent; so much so that It made my head spin like a lover wild with jealous imagination.

	Putting down the report I looked him in the eye. 

	But be smiled back : ‘‘You’ll have to trust me. It would be dangerous 
	for me to reveal the actual source as yet — and, as you see, it is too good a source to endanger. Also, there arc psychological reasons.” 

	Then followed an explanation which 1 was bound to concede was
	valid. There were German-speaking comrades from a certain inde- 
	pendent country which Hitler had invaded and subjugated, whose 
	young men had been sent off to fight Hitler s wars. But Hitler had 
	forgotten that the fathers of such men, as Socialists, had been murdered 
	by the Nazis, and that that particular country wanted as much as any 
	other occupied land to be liberated from the Germans. It was indeed 
	an Achilles heel in the robust Teutonic armor. But the psychological 
	rub was equally evident: these men disliked betraying their military 
	comrades; in fact, would not even admit to it themselves. 

	The less said about it, I agreed, the better. 


Tompkins says he got two high-level reports from Franco on the same day, suspected he was a German agent, confronted him on his source and trusted him.

Tompkins refers to "Franco" on a first name basis throughout the book, but introduces him as "Franco Mercurio":

	The young man 
	with the aristocratic manners was Franco Mercurio; he had no OSS 
	code name but appeared to be the gatherer of intelligence for the 
	radio. The man technically in charge of the team I gathered to be the 
	one code-named “Coniglio” or rabbit, a small man with dark piercing 
	eyes more like a ferret’s than a rabbit’s. Last of the group was a man 
	called Gambareri, a jovial fellow with a paunch who looked quite inof- 
	fensive but turned out to be the front man for the Parodi-Delfino indus- 
	trial combine with a Cagoulard-typc mind. 

	Of the lot, the only one I trusted immediately was Franco, and pos- 
	sibly Cervo, the policeman, for he sided openly with Franco. 

	Despite my mi.sgivings it was time to get down to business; so I in- 
	formed them there was to be an Allied landing somewhere along the 
	coast


presumably this is Malfatti, since he was headed of the Socialist Party's intelligence. From Tompkin's book:

	
	Franco promised a more detailed report would be forthcoming in 
	the afternoon. In the meantime the best news he brought was of a 
	long and detailed discussion with the leaders of his party (principally 
	Nenni) whom he had managed to convince that one of the best ways 
	of serving the Allied cause and doing the Germans the most damage 
	would be to create a first-rate information service. For this he had been 
	granted the use of up to a hundred men to be deficcted from their 
	normal partisan activities, entirely at his orders. For obvious security 
	reasons it was not to be known they would be w'orking for an Allied 
	intelligence organization, but merely as an information service for the 
	Socialist party. 


Katz identifies him as Malfatti.

here Tompkins identifies him as Malfatti (pg 138): http://www.znaci.net/00001/294.pdf


https://books.google.com/books?id=nGLcu_QQB6cC&pg=PA243&lpg=PA23
	The British were angry over what they considered a slipshod OSS operation in Italy. Even reputable Italian politicians complained to Donovan that "any scoundrel" in their country could get the ear of an OSS officer and sell him worthless information or a shady spy mission. Personnel problems had grown acute for the entire U.S. Army in Italy, with poorly trained replacements arriving from stateside, almost mutinous morale among weary front-line troops, and an alarming number of desertions or GIs shooting themselves in the foot to escape combat. Even so, the OSS operation breakdowns and security lapses in Italy had become a black eye for the agency. "Our Italian intelligence units have given me cause for anxiety," Donovan admitted in one cable to Galvin. He blamed his troubles on the Italian Americans Corvo had recruited. He thought they were mostly unreliable and addicted to political intrigue. Corvo thought Donovan and other snobby WASP's in the OSS were prejudiced against Italian Americans. But Donovan was as much at fault for the mess. The jumbled OSS organization in the country, after all, was his creation.

	By April the problems had begun to leak to the press. The New York Post speculated that FDR was unhappy "with our intelligence work in the Italian theater" and "Bill Donovan's OSS may soon by on their way out." Roosevelt was not actually paying attention to the OSS in Italy, but a senior U.S. Army officer was: General Jacob Devers, whose G-2 Donovan had threatened to throw out of a window the year before. Now the deputy supreme allied commander for the Mediterranean, Devers was convinced the OSS had wasted millions of tax dollars in Italy. He demanded "a thorough accounting" of everything Donovan had spent there. What's more, Devers intended to send his inspector general to the OSS to examine its ledgers and in the future he wanted Donovan to get his approval for every nickel the OSS spent in Italy.


The British were angry with OSS performance in Italy. Some Italian politicians said "any scoundrel" in Italy could get the ear of an OSS officer and feed them false information. Breakdowns in operations and security lapses in Italy became a black eye for OSS. Donovan was aware of this and blamed Corvo's recruits. Corvo thought Donovan and other snobby WASP's (Tompkins?) were racist against Italian Americans, which he recruited. Donovan created the OSS organization in Italy.

By April 1944 problems with the OSS in Italy had leaked to the U.S. press. FDR ignored this, but General Jacob Devers did not. He had conflicts with Donovan before. He wanted to send his inspector general to examine OSS ledgers.


------


NY Times on General Devers:

https://www.nytimes.com/2009/11/23/opinion/23colley.html
	How World War II Wasn’t Won

	...Devers never crossed. Gen. Dwight D. Eisenhower, the supreme commander, visited Devers’s headquarters that day and ordered him instead to stay on the Rhine’s west bank and attack enemy positions in northern Alsace. Devers was stunned. “We had a clean breakthrough,” he wrote in his diary. “By driving hard, I feel that we could have accomplished our mission.” Instead the war of attrition continued, giving the Germans a chance to counterattack three weeks later in what became known as the Battle of the Bulge, which cost 80,000 American dead and wounded.

	Garrison Davidson, then Devers’s engineering officer and later a superintendent of West Point, believed Devers’s attack would have succeeded and pre-empted the Bulge, writing, “I have often wondered what might have happened had Ike had the audacity to take a calculated risk, as General Patton would have.” Patton wrote in his diary that he also believed Eisenhower had missed a great opportunity; the Seventh Army’s commander, Lt. Gen. Alexander Patch, felt the same way.

	Why did Eisenhower refuse to allow Devers to cross? Eisenhower disliked Devers — a prim teetotaler who rubbed many gruff Army commanders the wrong way — and refused to include him among the generals fighting in northern France. Devers was appointed to lead the southern invasion by the Army chief of staff, George Marshall. Eisenhower would likely have fired Devers once the Sixth Army Group fell under his command in September 1944, but Devers had powerful patrons in Marshall and President Franklin D. Roosevelt.


according to DAVID P. COLLEY, Devers wanted to take a risk before the battle of the bulge, Eisenhower didn't like his plan and didn't like Devers, Devers had the support of George Marshall and FDR

assuming Devers one of the agentura, maybe this is what he was for? e.g. mess up the final battle with the Germans, keep WWII going on Western front and let Soviets take more.


------


https://www.cia.gov/library/readingroom/docs/CIA-RDP13X00001R000100160002-5.pdf

CIA's scan of OSS operations in Italy is illegible

pg 206 a good example

looks almost entirely an artifact of how they scanned it

documents released in a 2013 for a FOIA request

sueing them for failure to respond might be good idea, draw attention to this


------

this is an account of someone else who was there, "George C Chalou":

https://books.google.com/books?id=P3OIFS_yzyUC&pg=PA130&lpg=PA130&


pg 110 he goes over some of the books on OSS operations in Italy


	A slight majority of the books of this period comprised personal accounts by veterans of wartime experiencesss. The remainder was largely collections of anecdotes of OSS operations. Both types are said to have received encouragement from Gen. William Donovan, who wished some of the OSS saga told. The declassification of some records prior to the OSS's termination provided material for the collections of operational vignettes such as Ford and MacBain's Cloak and Dagger and Alsop and Braden's Sub Rosa. It is apparent that much of the literature of this era is of an embryonic quality and some, like Louis Huot's Guns for Tito, with its obvious gaps and political dyslexia, of indiifferent quality or historical value.



here is the book "guns for tito:"


http://www.znaci.net/00001/6.htm

says American and British intel supplied guns for Tito (around the same time of Foibe massacres)


https://books.google.com/books?id=P3OIFS_yzyUC&pg=PA110&lpg=PA110
	Allen Dulle's The Secret Surrender is at the other end of the quality spectrum. So too is Peers and Breli's Behind the Burma Road, which, like Dulles's book, is a firsthand account of important events.

	The first of the books by former OSS members critical of some aspect of the organization appeared during this period. I term these the literature of discontent, though they were in content much more than that. Donald Downe's The Scarlet Thread and Peter Tompkins's A Spy in Rome were the initial two of this category. They differ from later studies by non-affiliated authors in that they are not attacks against the institution or intelligence activities per se; rather, they express disagreement or personal unhappiness with some policy or portion, particularly with some of the management. Tompkins fumed against the "Johny-come-latelys," official views, and the "Italo-American Mafioso" in the OSS. Downes directed his barbs at what he called the "amateurs," "cast-offs," and "stupid sons of the rich and famous" in the organization.


goes over more books:

	
	...Aldo Icardi's American Master Spy is in a category of its own. The author's main motive in writing it was to give his version of the Holohan murder case in Italy


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Holohan_murder_case


Holocan case digs up more traitors in OSS, including Icardi who supposedly did the murder. Similar to Tompkin's book? A lot of it about cervo.



------

https://www.nytimes.com/1994/06/07/obituaries/biagio-m-corvo-74-intelligence-officer-during-world-war-ii.html

http://articles.courant.com/1994-06-07/news/9406070326_1_italian-government-pearl-harbor-italian-oss

Max Corvo maybe good guy?


review of his book: https://www.larouchepub.com/eiw/public/1994/eirv21n29-19940722/eirv21n29-19940722_065-in_memoriam_max_corvo_1920_1994.pdf


------

Where is the OSS report on Franco Malfatti?

Malfatti's wiki page:

https://translate.google.com/translate?hl=en&sl=it&u=https://it.wikipedia.org/wiki/Francesco_Malfatti_di_Montetretto&prev=search


of what can be found about Malatti:

https://books.google.com/books?id=BNYhIBIZHzUC&pg=PA222&lpg=PA222
	Lospinoso received his assignment -- apparently in a very sketchy way -- from Mussolini himself on March 19. It was to transfer the Jews from the coastal region to locations at least 100 kilometers from the sea. Within less than three days he arrived in Nice, set up his headquarters, and disappeared. At least he did as far as the Germans were concerned.

	On March 27, Muller, who seldom left Berlin, was received by Mussolini and asked how the mater would be handled. Mussolini promised cooperation between the two sides. When he returned to Berlin, Muller instructed Knochen to make contact with Lospinoso. On April 5, after three days of searching, Knochen (himself, not Rothke) notified Muller that he could not find him. Two days later Muller asked once again what was going on. Before resuming discusions with the Italians, after all, he had to know whether Lospinoso was even in France, as the chief of the Italian police claimed. The next day Knochen (in a letter by Rothke) wrote to Muller that Lospinoso had apparently returned to Italy. Before leaving he had left a list of questions with a captain named Francesco Malfatti di Montetretto, who was stationed in the Italian embassy in Paris. The questions had to do with German intentions against the Jews. Knochen expressed his position on the matter, or perhaps he signed a letter that expressed Rothke's opinion, which was that it seemed improper to conduct negotiations with a captain, especially given that they had been told to speak with Lospinoso. ...Knochen/Rothke added at the end of the letter that Malfatti claimed that the questions had reached him from his commanders in the army, not from Lospinoso.




https://books.google.com/books?id=nGLcu_QQB6cC&pg=PA157&lpg=PA157
	The other principal agent was Franco Malfatti who established an important intelligence organization. Malfatti ad gone into exile in Austria in the thirties. He joined the Socialist Party and worked for the loyalists in the Spanish Civil War. "From then on he had been active one way or another in partisan and clandestine anti-Fascist organization." He served in the Italian army. After Mussolini's ouster he was an intelligence officer on Badoglio's staff, but at the same time in secret was working to re-organize the Socialist Party. Wen the King and Badoglio fled to Brindisi Malfatti became actively engaged in the Socialist military underground. Then he met and joined Giglio. The Socialist Party had the most effective spy system in Rome.


pg 170

	
	...Badoglio's suporters were at work making a deal with the neo-fascists


http://www.lander.odessa.ua/doc/OSS%20-%20The%20Secret%20History%20of%20America%27s%20First%20Central%20Intelligence%20Agency.pdf
	It was impossible for Tompkins to operate an effective espionage network and still maintain complete political neutrality. The SIM- Badogliani intelligence had proved worthless and sometimes danger- ously misleading. The most effective spy system in Rome was directed by the Socialist Party underground, whose leaders readily agreed to channel information to Tompkins and his young Socialist assistant, Baron Franco Malfatti," 1 for transmission to the military command at Anzio. Tompkins hoped to keep this arrangement secret. He did not wish to be accused of political favoritism at a time when the CLN and Badogliani were in open conflict in the south.


Tompkins wanted to keep his relationship with the socialists secret (I guess from right-leaning parties? British? who else?)


https://books.google.com/books?id=1OAkDwAAQBAJ&pg=PT289&lpg=PT289
	Malfatti's network was impressively well connected and included Italian officer and officials who had access to the highest German decision-making, doctors who talked to wounded German soldiers, and many scores of people whose homes or farms lay between Rome and Anzio and who watched German movements. Audaciously, Malfatti set up his office in the back room of a German bookshop directly across the road from the German-sequestered Hotel Excelsior on the Via Veneto. Here was brought information on the Germans' attack plans and the precise location of their tanks, gun emplacements and ammunition dumps. All was given to Peter Tompkins


hard to find anything about him

Katz's book "Fatal Silence" said to be a source on his network


Katz "Battle for Rome" book:

	Malfatti succeeded in a high-level infiltration of not only Kesselring’s headquarters but also Kappler’s Gestapo in the Via Tasso, the Fascist command of the Open City of Rome, the Fascist Republican secret services, the Office of Censorship, and the staffs of Rome’s luxury hotels. Thus he maintained constant surveillance and eavesdropping at the haunts of the German High Command.

	The pyramidal system provided for the rapid movement of the information gathered from local depositories to a central headquarters whose location was frequently changed. The raw intelligence, after screening and sorting, would be brought to Malfatti’s headquarters. Adding a touch of mockery of the enemy, Malfatti worked out of the offices of a German publisher and bookstore directly across from the Hotel Excelsior on the Via Veneto, the Kurfürstendamm of an exclusive Little Berlin in occupied Rome.



http://romehistorymu.wixsite.com/romehistorymu/german-occupation
	The German SS headquarters was established on Via Veneto in the Excelsior Hotel, right in the so called “dark heart of fascism”, in a very elitist part of Rome. The hotel’s main floor was transformed into a stock room for machine guns, and held, “drunken parties” while stealing anything they could and essentially sacking the hotel. Italians that were considered to be enemies to the Nazi regime of the Fascists had to fear not only the Nazi police, but Italian police as well. But while some stayed to work along with the Germans, others were more concerned of getting out of the city. A New York Times article reported that members of the new Fascist Republican militia had been slain, and fascist leaders were attempting to leave the city because “of fear of public reprisals and imminent Allied occupation.”

	Life for working-class Italians under the Nazis was harsh and terrifying. Everything they did was monitored. The Nazis set curfews that they expected to be followed. Food was scarce, and the partisans made Rome a volatile and dangerous place for the rest of the populaces, with bombs and gunfire echoing in the distance day and night.



------

http://www.spiegel.de/international/germany/unpunished-massacre-in-italy-how-postwar-germany-let-war-criminals-go-free-a-809537.html

more on officials avoiding prosecutions for Adreatine massacre



------



http://www.lander.odessa.ua/doc/OSS%20-%20The%20Secret%20History%20of%20America%27s%20First%20Central%20Intelligence%20Agency.pdf
	Though his parents had been on intimate terms with most of the royal entourage of Victor Emmanuel, Tompkins' own sympathies lay with the democratic left of the anti-fascist movement.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Victor_Emmanuel_III_of_Italy
	On 10 June 1940, ignoring advice that the country was unprepared, Mussolini made the fatal decision to have Italy enter World War II on the side of Nazi Germany. 


then Tompkins spends 6 months in Italy hanging out with Nazis in fancy bars

sounds like a fucking Nazi to me


https://books.google.com/books?id=jjP3DAAAQBAJ&pg=PA224&lpg=PA224
	...he kept a horse and an Alfa Romeo sports car...

	...Camillo at twenty-four was a sociable young man with a pensive, serious side. Peter Tompkins, an American brought up largely in Italy, had made friends with him at Harvard and admired his "other-worldly poise and at times monk-like detachment." He later recalled how he and Camillo "spent much of the summer of the drole de guerre in 1940 pondering about the meaning of life and the roles we should play."


Tompkins and Italian royalty pondering meaning of life

also pg 232 says Tompkins posed as brother of Caetani?


	Stories survive of how, despite his detestation of fascism, Camillo eventually came to join the Italian army.


https://www.vqronline.org/essay/shadowy-lady-street-dark-shops

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Gelasio_Caetani


https://books.google.com/books?id=sWB9BgAAQBAJ&pg=PA89&lpg=PA89
	Il Duce set up a special bureau to deal with "Fascism Abroad." To Prince Caetani, Ambassador to the United States, he entrusted the delicate task of arbitrating disputes among the various factions in the United States.


http://www.lander.odessa.ua/doc/OSS%20-%20The%20Secret%20History%20of%20America%27s%20First%20Central%20Intelligence%20Agency.pdf
	Several days later, Tompkins had his first serious misfortune. His radio operator was arrested by fascist police and his transmitter seized. Unable to send further intelligence, Tompkins spent the months of April and May fleeing from the fascists. These were also months of tragedy for the CLN underground. Nine Communist leaders were arrested. The Socialist resistance was also hard-pressed as two of its highest officials were taken into fascist custody. Tompkins suspected treachery. "Someone high up in the underground had been selling left- wing party members down the river." 32 


Tompkins suspects a mole

	
	...But only an OSS research unit and the Counter-intelligence Branch, X-2, maintained their base of operations in the city. When Peter Tompkins returned to Washington, his lists of suspected enemy agents were inherited by the X-2 chief, James Angleton, the son of Colonel Carter's executive officer and a thin, Yale-educated amateur poet with an amazing capacity for Byzantine intrigue. 


Tompkins gives Angleton a list


	...On September 26, Holohan, carrying $16,000 in operational funds, led his group in a parachute jump to a mountainous area some fifty miles northwest of Milan, not far from the Swiss border. They were first met by an agent of the ORI intelligence network (created a year before by Raimondo Craveri and Peter Tompkins). A meeting was then ar- ranged with Ferruccio Parri.


Tompkin's ORI (probably) murders Holohan


	...It was a depressing moment, that instant when the Cold War mentality first struck the unsuspecting intelligence amateur. Peter Tompkins, having at last recovered from his harrowing experiences in Rome, was sent to Germany to work with Socialist union groups. He found himself "with the advance guard of the OSS in Berlin, where, well inside the Soviet Zone, with a Russian major and a bottle of vodka, I realized, sadly, that our enemies had changed." 81


Tompkin's tops it off with a drink with Soviets in Germany



------


From Katz, "Death in Rome:"


https://books.google.com/books?id=BJvtToQ1wtEC&q=Malfatti+OR+Franco+Tompkins&dq=Malfatti+OR+Franco+Tompkins&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwjUnoyx_fjaAhVkhOAKHR1LDNkQ6AEISzAG
	...Nazis Exact 10-1 Penalty for Slaying of Occupying Police for Slaying of Occupying Police."

	Somehow, however, after the hour of sunset the American OSS spy in the center of Rome was still unaware of the news. While waiting for word about the raid from Malfatti,


above is NY Times headline, March 26, 1944 issue:

https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1944/03/26/88597872.pdf

short article on page 6


Katz got flak for his books ousting vatican?

https://www.cia.gov/library/readingroom/docs/DOLLMANN,%20EUGENE_0080.pdf



https://www.nytimes.com/2010/10/22/arts/22katz.html
	But Mr. Katz’s most frequent subject was the Holocaust, especially as it pertained to Italy. In 2003, he published “The Battle for Rome: The Germans, the Allies, the Partisans and the Pope, September 1943-June 1944,” an account of the German occupation of Rome from the fall of Mussolini to the city’s liberation. In many ways it expanded on his first book, “Death in Rome,” the one that had brought him notoriety.

	“Death in Rome” (1967) was a reconstruction of the infamous Ardeatine Caves massacre of 1944, when the Nazis, in reprisal for an attack by Italian resistance fighters on a German-speaking police battalion, herded 335 Italian men — prisoners and civilians — to a series of man-made caves on the outskirts of Rome and shot them. In his book, Mr. Katz, citing evidence he later called strong but circumstantial, said that Pope Pius XII had learned of the planned executions 19 hours before they occurred but chose to remain silent, an accusation that was immediately denied by the Vatican.

	“This is not a book of history but a polemic in which the special interests of the author are dominant and in conflict with the interests of research and presentation of the facts,” a Vatican spokesman said at the time. (Among documents later released by the Vatican, one indicated that Pius had, in fact, been made aware of the Nazi reprisal, though only five hours before it took place.)

	The book was made into a film, “Massacre in Rome,” in 1973. The next year, in a legal proceeding initiated by the niece of Pius XII, who had died in 1958, Mr. Katz along with the film’s director, George P. Cosmatos, and producer, Carlo Ponti, were charged with “defaming the memory” of Pius. They were found guilty and given suspended sentences. (Mr. Katz’s was 14 months.) After several appeals and counterappeals, the charges were set aside in 1980 by Italy’s highest court.



damn you can't say anything about the pope or you go to jail?


https://www.telegraph.co.uk/news/obituaries/religion-obituaries/8144130/Robert-Katz.html
	In 1994 Katz was a consultant to an ABC television team which tracked down the former SS officer Erich Priebke, one of the men responsible for the Ardeatine Caves massacre, to his hideout in Argentina. The resulting interview caused outrage and led to Priebke's extradition to Italy and subsequent sentencing to life imprisonment. In 1997 Katz published an account of the trial, Dossier Priebke.


Katz helped track down Priebke


	...In 1994 Katz was a consultant to an ABC television team which tracked down the former SS officer Erich Priebke, one of the men responsible for the Ardeatine Caves massacre, to his hideout in Argentina. The resulting interview caused outrage and led to Priebke's extradition to Italy and subsequent sentencing to life imprisonment. In 1997 Katz published an account of the trial, Dossier Priebke. 


http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-dyn/content/article/2010/10/21/AR2010102105984.html
	Undeterred by his brush with the law, Mr. Katz again accused the Pope of failing to speak out against German wartime atrocities in "The Battle for Rome." The book made use of newly released military documents to detail the nine-month German occupation of Rome after the fall of Benito Mussolini in 1943. 


what are these newly released military documents?


	... Undeterred by his brush with the law, Mr. Katz again accused the Pope of failing to speak out against German wartime atrocities in "The Battle for Rome." The book made use of newly released military documents to detail the nine-month German occupation of Rome after the fall of Benito Mussolini in 1943. 


D'Este was one of the guys who tried to cover for a Nazi--what's up with that?


article on "Battle for Rome" by Katz:

https://www.nytimes.com/2004/01/11/books/chapters/the-battle-for-rome.html
	Notified at his headquarters in East Prussia within minutes of the attack, Hitler shrieked for revenge, demanding a reprisal that would "make the world tremble." His bile alone set in motion a hastily assembled killing machine in Rome that would overcome even internal opposition from the occupiers themselves. The next day, 335 men and teenaged boys - a near-perfect cross section of the male half of Rome, not one of them even remotely connected to the attack - were seized from various parts of the city, trucked to an abandoned labyrinth of caves in Via Ardeatina, near the Christian catacombs of ancient Rome, and slain in groups of five. It was the first wartime atrocity and one of the worst perpetrated on Italian soil.

	...The dramatic story of Rome under the German occupation (September 8, 1943-June 4, 1944) remains largely untold, particularly outside of Italy. No English-language work on the subject has appeared in the last twenty years, leaving untapped a wealth of significant primary material that has since become available. Between 2000 and 2002 the CIA released the so-called crown jewels of America's wartime intelligence - hundreds of thousands of long-classified documents of its predecessor agency, the Office of Strategic Services (OSS). The declassified diplomatic papers of the Vatican archives relating specifically to the occupation of Rome have barely been skimmed, likewise those of the Italian archives; similarly underreported - and entirely unpublished - is the mass of material generated in the mid-90s by the two Rome trials of former SS officer Erich Priebke, as well as documents from trials in the late 70s and 80s, including my own. Thus, earlier books about the occupation did not have the benefit of the now nearly complete and nuanced big picture.


https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/politics/2000/06/27/allies-knew-of-plan-for-italys-jews/94bf1e8f-23f8-4da2-bd00-460668d3b82f/?utm_term=.48489026a4b9
	The message from Nazi security headquarters, as deciphered by Allied code-breakers, was blunt and chilling. Despite the reservations of some German officials in Rome, Nazi leaders were determined to push ahead with "the immediate and thorough eradication of Jews in Italy."

	Released yesterday at the National Archives as part of a massive effort to declassify World War II war crimes records, the decrypted Nazi message of October 1943 shows for the first time that the Allies had extensive and almost contemporaneous intelligence on the Nazi roundup of Italian Jews, thanks to Britain's Enigma code-breaking operation. It provided new evidence in a long-running debate on what the Allies knew about the Holocaust at the time and whether anything could have been done to prevent the murders of millions of Jews.

	The intercepted intelligence messages were circulated to a small group of British officials, including Prime Minister Winston Churchill, and also were swiftly relayed to the U.S. government. Although Churchill was an avid consumer of raw Enigma intelligence, it is not known whether he or anyone of authority in Washington read these particular reports.

	Historians described the release of 400,000 pages of material--from the Office of Strategic Services, the wartime forerunner to the Central Intelligence Agency--as a major step for understanding the secret war between the Allies and Nazi Germany. The documents include some of the most closely guarded secrets of the war, dealing with OSS sources and methods, the so-called "crown jewels" of the American wartime intelligence operation.


well they were asking Malfatti about it


	...Some historians believe the notion that Allied leaders were largely ignorant of the Holocaust will now have to be revised. Others go even further and argue that Churchill and Roosevelt had a moral obligation to issue much more explicit public denunciations of Nazi behavior based on the intelligence intercepts.

	"A statement by Churchill or Roosevelt might have led the Jews of Rome to take seriously the evidence of imminent deportation," said Timothy Naftali, an intelligence expert at the University of Virginia, one of two American academics appointed by the National Archives to review the latest materials.


Damn Churchil and Roosevelt helped cover up the Holoaust too

maybe it's because they're fucking Nazis


https://www.archives.gov/iwg/reports/june-2000.html

writeup on the documents


    October 15	

    Heinrich Mueller, head of the Gestapo, talks with a German Foreign Office official about the difficulties of seizing Jews in foreign countries with limited police manpower. He indicates misgivings about Hitler's order to roundup the Jews of Rome.

    *October 16	

    Kappler reports to Kaltenbrunner that German forces managed to seize 1,259 Jews in Rome. The Italian police were considered unreliable in this action, and the Italian public engaged in passive resistance. Although the German police had to release the part-Jews, foreign Jews, and families in mixed marriages, they are scheduled to ship off 1002 Jews on October 18.


is this when Mueller was talking to Malfatti?



------


http://chuma.cas.usf.edu/~dietrich/TIMES-04-Molly-Tompkins.htm
	He was not Shaw's son; he was already three at the time his mother met the playwright. "But Shaw took me under his wing, treated me like a son, paid my school fees and in a sense protected me from my mother. She was very authoritarian, whereas he was tender and loving and took my side."

	He clearly remembered the sensation of Shaw's rough tweed on his legs when he sat on his lap as a small child. "He taught me how to rebel against moral hypocrisy."


Tompkins raised in part by Bernard Shaw, may or may not be his dad, Shaw taught him how to "rebel against moral hypocrisy"


shaw would hang out with Soviet agents and Stalin


https://www.telegraph.co.uk/news/uknews/1414571/Baroness-warned-MI5-about-Blunt-in-1951.html
	MI5 was warned as early as 1951 that Anthony Blunt was a member of the Communist Party and friend of a suspected Soviet agent.

	The Security Service learned of Blunt's associations in an interview with a Ukrainian-born baroness, Moura Budberg - who in London became a Left-wing socialite and suspected Soviet agent - immediately after Guy Burgess and Donald Maclean fled to Moscow.

	...She married her second husband, Baron Budberg, in Estonia, but left him within months. After being cleared of spying, she fled to join the Russian writer Maxim Gorky, whose mistress she became.

	Moving to London in the early 1930s, she quickly established an intellectual salon frequented by her latest lover, H G Wells, the filmmaker Alexander Korda, for whom she worked, and George Bernard Shaw.


Budberg suspected of spying, dating Russian Nietzche and "the Irish Neitzche"


https://www.theguardian.com/uk/2001/jan/07/books.booksnews1
	Lynn also suggests that it was Budberg's influence that led to the meeting between Stalin and Wells, George Bernard Shaw, and Beatrice and Sidney Webb in 1934, after which the British visitors publicly praised the dictator and the Communist philosophy.  


said to have convinced Shaw to hang out with Stalin


https://www.nytimes.com/2017/09/11/opinion/why-george-bernard-shaw-had-a-crush-on-stalin.html

NY Times trying to epxlain why Shaw admired Stalin


https://archive.org/stream/TheSwordAndTheShield-TheMitrokhinArchiveAndTheSecretHistoryOfTheKGB/The%20Sword%20and%20the%20Shield%20-%20The%20Mitrokhin%20Archive%20and%20the%20Secret%20History%20of%20the%20KGB_djvu.txt
	Caimcross, a committed 
	heterosexual, later wrote a history of polygamy which 
	concluded with a quotation from George Bernard Shaw: 
	“Women will always prefer a 10 percent share of a first- 
	rate man to sole ownership of a mediocre man.”


shaw a creep, Cairncross quotes him


http://spartacus-educational.com/Jshaw.htm
	Shaw hoped to become a writer and during the next seven years wrote five unsuccessful novels. He was more successful with his journalism and contributed to Pall Mall Gazette. Shaw got on well with the newspaper's campaigning editor, William Stead, who attempted to use the power of the popular press to obtain social reform.

	In 1882 Shaw heard Henry George lecture on land nationalization. This had a profound effect on Shaw and helped to develop his ideas on socialism. Shaw now joined the Social Democratic Federation and its leader, H. H. Hyndman, introduced him to the works of Karl Marx. Shaw was convinced by the economic theories in Das Kapital but was aware that it would have little impact on the working class. He later wrote that although the book had been written for the working man, "Marx never got hold of him for a moment. It was the revolting sons of the bourgeois itself - Lassalle, Marx, Liebknecht, Morris, Hyndman, Bax, all like myself, crossed with squirearchy - that painted the flag red. The middle and upper classes are the revolutionary element in society; the proletariat is the conservative element."


Shaw started off after working as clerk working as a journalist, wrote for Pall Mall Gazette and got along with William Stead

joined socialist club and read Marx (not new at the time), concluded proletariat are "the conserviative element" and middle and upperclasses "revolutionary element" of society


	Shaw became an active member of the Social Democratic Federation (SDF), and became friends with others in the movement including William Morris, Eleanor Marx, Annie Besant, Walter Crane, Edward Aveling and Belfort Bax. In May 1884 Shaw joined the Fabian Society and the following year, the Socialist League, an organisation that had been formed by Morris and Marx after a dispute with H. H. Hyndman, the leader of the SDF.

	George Bernard Shaw gave lectures on socialism on street corners and helped distribute political literature. On 13th November he took part in a demonstration in London that resulted in the Bloody Sunday Riot. However, he always felt uncomfortable with trade union members and preferred debate to action.


joined the Socialist League and hung out with Marx's friends and his daughter, did some commie activism that ended in blood


Hyndman the guy who introduced Shaw to Marx

http://spartacus-educational.com/TUhyndman.htm
	In 1869 Hyndman toured the world visiting the United States, Australia and several European countries. He continued to write for the Pall Mall Gazette, where he praised the merits of British imperialism and criticised those advocating Home Rule for Ireland, Hyndman was also very hostile to the experiments in democracy that were taking place in America.


Hydnman also wrote for Pall Mall Gazette, praised British imperialism and hated democracy


	Hyndman decided on a career in politics but unable to find a party that he could fully support, decided to stand as an Independent for the constituency of Marylebone in the 1880 General Election. Denounced as a Tory by William Gladstone, Hyndman got very little support from the electorate and facing certain defeat, withdrew from the contest.


with that, he set out to become a politician


	Soon after the election Hyndman read a novel based on the life of Ferdinand Lassalle. Hyndman became fascinated with Lassalle and decided to research this romantic hero who had been killed in a duel in 1864. Hyndman discovered that Lassalle had been a wealthy socialist who had financially supported the work of Karl Marx. Hyndman decided to read The Communist Manifesto and although he had doubts about some of Marx's ideas, for example, the inevitability of a socialist revolution, he was greatly impressed by his analysis of capitalism.

	Hyndman now decided to form Britain's first socialist political party. The Social Democratic Federation (SDF) had its first meeting on 7th June, 1881. Many socialists refused to join the SDF because they were highly suspicious of a wealthy man funding a radical political party. They were also aware that in the past Hyndman had been opposed to socialist ideas such as universal suffrage. Hyndman persuaded some socialists that he had genuinely changed his views, and those who eventually joined the SDF included William Morris, Ernest Bax, Henry Hyde Champion, John Burns, Ben Tillett, John Spargo, Tom Mann, Edward Aveling George Lansbury and Karl Marx's daughter, Eleanor Marx. However, Friedrich Engels, Marx's long-term collaborator, refused to support Hyndman's venture.


it didn't work, but he heard a wealthy financier financed Marx and decided to switch from British imperialism and start the socialist league



http://spartacus-educational.com/TUbloody.htm
	The SDF decided to continue with their planned meeting with Henry M. Hyndman, John Burns and Robert Cunninghame Graham being the three main speakers. Edward Carpenter explained what happened next: "The three leading members of the SDF - Hyndman, Burns and Cunninghame Graham - agreed to march up arm-in-arm and force their way if possible into the charmed circle. Somehow Hyndman was lost in the crowd on the way to the battle, but Graham and Burns pushed their way through, challenged the forces of Law and Order, came to blows, and were duly mauled by the police, arrested, and locked up. I was in the Square at the time. The crowd was a most good-humoured, easy going, smiling crowd; but presently it was transformed. A regiment of mounted police came cantering up. The order had gone forth that we were to be kept moving. To keep a crowd moving is I believe a technical term for the process of riding roughshod in all directions, scattering, frightening and batoning the people."


Hyndman leads charge of police incitement mission at Bloody Sunday, leads comrades to police and slips into crowd as they get beaten then whole crowd starts getting beaten

similar to bloody Sunday in Russia? police spy leading crowd to be beaten by police


interesting fact on Pall Mall Gazette:

https://www.quora.com/How-and-when-did-Marx-became-so-famous
	Marx gained additional attention with the foundation of the revolutionary Paris Commune in 1871, which was widely ‘blamed’ on the activities of the IWMA. A minority of the Commune’s leaders were indeed members of this organisation, but not all were supporters of the Marx faction. Marx defended the Commune in the British press (ironically, I believe it was only the Tory Pall Mall Gazette which was prepared to print his articles).


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/The_Pall_Mall_Gazette
	The Pall Mall Gazette took the name of a fictional newspaper conceived by William Makepeace Thackeray. Pall Mall is a street in London where many gentlemen's clubs are located, hence Thackeray's description of this imaginary newspaper in his novel The History of Pendennis (1848–1850):

    	"We address ourselves to the higher circles of society: we care not to disown it—the Pall Mall Gazette is written by gentlemen for gentlemen; its conductors speak to the classes in which they live and were born. The field-preacher has his journal, the radical free-thinker has his journal: why should the Gentlemen of England be unrepresented in the Press?


wow and it was created for elitist pricks too what a surprise




https://timeline.com/child-prostitution-stead-eliza-armstrong-a3c0aa00b860
	At one of the Salvation Army’s purity rallies that fall, the crowd agitated for answers. Protesters chanted “Armstrong! Armstrong!” and demanded to know what became of the girl in the story. Stead, who attended the event, stepped forward. “I will tell you about Armstrong,” he shouted, before admitting the entire story was a setup and the rape never happened. But not to worry, Armstrong was safe and sound; they shipped her to France to work as a laundress and live with a Salvationist family.


Bernard Shaw's friend at Pall Mall bought and drugged a 13 year old girl and may or may not have raped her


	...Authorities began an investigation. They arrested Jarrett for abducting Armstrong. When Stead headed to the police station to defend her, they arrested him too. After a short trial, Jarrett, Mourez, and Stead were convicted of abduction and procurement; the women served six months, while Stead served only three. As compensation, the Armstrong family was awarded a furnished house. Eliza Armstrong was returned, then sent to a training school for servants.

	Stead served time like a celebrity. A fellow prisoner worked as his personal manservant. He continued to edit the Pall Mall Gazette from behind bars. “Never had I pleasanter holiday, a more charming season of repose,” he said after his release. In fact, his career blossomed. Every year on the anniversary of his conviction, he wore his prison uniform in “triumph”—until he died on the Titanic in 1912.


https://attackingthedevil.co.uk/pmg/tribute/mt1.php

he sounds like he did it

on Shaw's relationship with Stead:

https://www.jstor.org/stable/449390?seq=1#page_scan_tab_contents


more on Stead:

https://www.theguardian.com/books/1999/oct/16/books.guardianreview
	Stead's campaigns had begun in Darlington, where, at the age of 21, he had been made editor of the Northern Echo. His strident support of Russia in its disputes with Turkey offended many of his readers. But his rumbustious style of journalism so attracted London radicals that he was invited to become assistant to John Morley, editor of the Pall Mall Gazette; when Morley was elected to parliament, Stead succeeded him.

	...His campaigns - tailor-made for a barely literate electorate - were built on sensation and the perverse combination of prurience and piety which still characterises tabloid "exposures".

	Like many journalists of his sort, Stead was invincibly sanctimonious. He employed private detectives to search for proof of Charles Stewart Parnell's adultery with Katharine O'Shea and when the evidence was inconclusive, wrote damaging innuendo about the Irish leader's "suburban retreat" in Eltham. 


early tabloid? maybe blackmailing London's elite 


	...The House of Lords had three times passed bills that raised the age of consent from 13 to 16. But each attempt at reform had been voted down by the Commons - largely on the grounds that girls who looked older than their years might seduce rich men and blackmail them. 


says something about House of Lords?


	...Stead chose to tell only half the truth. In July 1885, the Pall Mall Gazette published the first instalment of its revelation. Under the headline "The maiden tribute of modern Babylon", he described not the contrived outrage which he had acted out but what he claimed was a real abduction and rape. The story was told in lurid language. "All was quiet and still. A few moments later the door opened and the purchaser entered. There was a brief silence and then a wild and piteous cry - not a loud shriek but a helpless startled scream like the bleat of a frightened lamb."

	Fashionable society was outraged - not by the discovery that vice was common in London, but by Stead's decision to expose it. 


say something about "fashionable society?"


	...Released from prison, Stead was even more convinced of his duty to purify society in general and politics in particular. He was immediately presented with another - though less justified - opportunity for moral outrage. Charles Dilke, the rising star of the Liberal Party, had been cited as co-respondent in a divorce case. For weeks the Pall Mall Gazette published supporting rumours ranging from the co-respondent's "forwardness" towards Lady Randolph Churchill, to the allegation that he "had six intrigues going at once". But Stead's preoccupation with vice was soon overtaken by a new obsession. He had become a spiritualist and, after the death of his son, was convinced that Julia A Ames - an American journalist who had met him in London shortly before her death - was sending him messages in which she "described what life was like for Willie on the other side". She also warned him of impending disaster. 


after prison, Stead continued doing tabloid things then became a spiritualist contacting "other side"


	In 1912 Stead was invited to join the maiden voyage of the Titanic. Shortly before he left he told a friend: "I shall die a violent death." Asked how he knew, he replied: "I cannot tell. But I have had a vision and I know it to be true."The disaster in which he died had been foreshadowed in an article which he had written for the Pall Mall Gazette 20 years before. It concluded: "This is exactly what might take place and will take place if liners are set free short of lifeboats." When the Titanic (only 1,178 boat spaces for 2,224 passengers) hit the iceberg, he made no attempt to save his own life. Instead, he took his death for granted. "He was at the forefront with the women and children, putting them into the boats." 


this is weird


	The warmest tribute was paid to Stead by the admiral of the fleet, "Jackie" Fisher - an unlikely admirer of a radical journalist. It was Captain Fisher who, back in 1884, had supplied Stead with the information on which the Pall Mall Gazette based its unjustified allegation that Britain was vulnerable to attack from the sea. "Leaks" - like investigation, revelation and interview - were essential to the new journalism. Stead demonstrated that the techniques can be used for both good purposes and bad. 


more on stead:

http://spartacus-educational.com/Jstead.htm
	Stead was a strict Puritan who favoured social reform. He declared soon after becoming editor of the newspaper, "the Press is the greatest agency for influencing public opinion in the world" and that "the true and only lever by which thrones and governments could be shaken and the masses of the people raised". 


took that to heart?


	...He condemned the action of the police after the Bloody Sunday affair. This brought him into conflict with William Gladstone and other members of the Liberal Party. However, he also upset the socialists who organized the demonstration. Henry M. Hyndmanlater admitted: "For myself, I never could stand the man. His mind, his ethic, his manners, his methods, alike revolted me. He was that not uncommon variety of self-conscious ascetic, a Puritan chock-full of guile, and in his way utterly unscrupulous. At one moment when we were at odds with the Tory Government, and it was quite possible serious trouble would come of it, Stead took, or pretended to take, our side, and undoubtedly did us some good. We all of us thought he meant what he said, and that in all good faith he did what he did.

	Not a bit of it. The whole affair was carried on, so far as he was concerned, for the greater glory of himself and his newspaper. The night before the great meeting in Trafalgar Square he published an article obviously meant to do the Socialists as much harm as possible, because it might advertise his journal."


Hyndman trashed Stead for pretending to take socialists side in Bloody Sunday then trashing socialists in his newspaper


	...Stead left the Pall Mall Gazette in January, 1890, and established the Review of Reviews. As his biographer, Joseph O. Baylen, pointed out: "Established in a brief partnership with George Newnes, which was soon to be superseded by a loan from the Salvation Army and a subvention from Cecil Rhodes, the journal was a highly successful venture, with counterparts quickly instituted by Stead in the United States (1891) and Australia (1892). In the Review of Reviews, as in the Pall Mall Gazette, he advocated the union of English-speaking peoples, the expansion and federation of the British empire, Irish home rule, and the maintenance of morality in government and politics."

	Stead worked hard for an end to the arms race and was fully committed to the principle of arbitration and to the International Court of Justice. In 1899 he advocated an end to conflict with South Africa and as a result of his membership of the Stop the War Committee and his special periodical, War Against War in South Africa, Stead was accused of being pro-Boer.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/W._T._Stead
	He was an early imperialist dreamer, whose influence on Cecil Rhodes in South Africa remained of primary importance; many politicians and statesmen, who on most subjects were completely at variance with his ideas, nevertheless owed something to them. Rhodes made him his confidant, and was inspired in his will by his suggestions; and Stead was intended to be one of Rhodes's executors. However, at the time of the Second Boer War Stead threw himself into the Boer cause and attacked the government with characteristic violence, and consequently his name was removed from the will's executors.[23]


https://archive.org/stream/lastwillandtest00steagoog/lastwillandtest00steagoog_djvu.txt
	Finding that I sympathised with his ideas about English- 
	speaking reunion and his Society — although I did not see eye 
	to eye with him about the tariff war — Mr. Rhodes superseded 
	the will, which he had made in 1888, on a sheet of notepaper, 
	which left his fortune to " X.," by a formal will, in which the 
	whole of his real and personal estate was left to " X." and to 
	'* W. Stead, of the Review of Reviews." This will, the . 
	fourth in order, was signed in March, 1891. 


stead got money from Cecil Rhodes (white supremacist who subjugated south africa) and influenced him and got on his will, supported imperialism, then turned around and supported Boer (did he actually do anything to help them?)


http://spartacus-educational.com/Jstead.htm
	Stead attempted to establish a morning newspaper in 1904 but this ended in failure and brought him to the brink of bankruptcy, from which he was rescued by the generosity of several friends. He continued to work as a journalist and reported on the Russian Revolution of 1905.


what did he report on Russian revolution?


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/W._T._Stead
	In 1905, Stead travelled to Russia to try to discourage violence, but his tour and talks were unsuccessful[28]


http://spartacus-educational.com/Jstead.htm
	In 1906 Emmeline Pankhurst sent Annie Kenney to meet Stead. According to Fran Abrams: "Perhaps Emmeline knew of Stead's fondness for young girls, which Sylvia experienced too. On one occasion Annie had to appeal to Emmeline to ask him not to kiss her when she went to his office. But Annie liked Stead, and he quickly became a father figure. Before their first meeting was over she was sitting on the arm of his chair, telling him all about her life. He responded by telling her she must come to him if she was ever lonely or in trouble. Later he even let her use a room in his house in Smith Square to rest during Westminster lobbies and demonstrations, and he lent her £25 to help her organise her first big London meeting." Annie became very close to Stead and used to spend time with him at his house on Hayling Island in Hampshire. In one article Stead argued that Annie Kenney was the new Josephine Butler.


Stead had a "fondness for young girls"


https://www.telegraph.co.uk/history/titanic-anniversary/9195793/WT-Stead-a-forgotten-victim-of-Titanic.html

https://www.theguardian.com/media/greenslade/2012/dec/05/investigative-journalism-irish-independent
	An investigation into the founding father of investigative journalism

	...It explores the many contradictions of this extraordinary man. He campaigned for women's rights but was unnerved by the rise of the New Woman. He advocated world peace but promoted rises in defence spending in order to pursue imperialistic expansion. He was a Christian, but also a spiritualist. 


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/W._T._Stead
	In the 1890s, Stead became increasingly interested in spiritualism.[29] In 1893 he founded a spiritualist quarterly, called Borderland, in which he gave full play to his interest in psychical research.[6][29] 

	...Stead claimed to be in receipt of messages from the spirit world and, in 1892, to be able to produce automatic writing.[29][31] His spirit contact was alleged to be the departed Julia A. Ames, an American temperance reformer and journalist whom he met in 1890 shortly before her death. In 1909, he established Julia's Bureau, where inquirers could obtain information about the spirit world from a group of resident mediums.[29]

	Grant Richards said that "The thing that operated most strongly in lessening Stead's hold on the general public was his absorption in spiritualism".[34]

	The physiologist Ivor Lloyd Tuckett wrote that Stead had no scientific training and was credulous when it came to the subject of spiritualism. Tuckett examined a case of spirit photography that Stead had claimed was genuine. Stead visited a photographer who produced a photograph of him with an alleged deceased soldier known as "Piet Botha". Stead claimed the photographer could not have come across any information about Piet Botha; however, Tuckett discovered that an article in 1899 had been published on Pietrus Botha in a weekly magazine with a portrait and personal details.[35]

	In the early 20th century, Arthur Conan Doyle and Stead were duped into believing that the stage magicians Julius and Agnes Zancig had genuine psychic powers. Both Doyle and Stead wrote the Zancigs performed telepathy. In 1924 Julius and Agnes Zancig confessed that their mind reading act was a trick and published the secret code and all the details of the trick method they had used under the title of Our Secrets!! in a London Newspaper.[36]

	Ten years after the Titanic went down, Stead's daughter Estelle published The Blue Island: Experiences of a New Arrival Beyond the Veil,[37] which purported to be a communication with Stead via a medium


Stead published spiritualist magazines and claimed he was in contact with the dead and doing psychic things


	...A later sighting of Stead, by survivor Philip Mock, has him clinging to a raft with John Jacob Astor IV. "Their feet became frozen," reported Mock, "and they were compelled to release their hold. Both were drowned."[38] 



more on "Paul Mall Gazette:"


http://spartacus-educational.com/Jpall.htm
	In 1883 the Pall Mall Gazette carried a series of articles on the subject of child prostitution. He also published this information as a Pall Mall Gazette Extra called The Maiden Tribute of Modern Babylon. This approach pushed up sales of the newspaper from 8,000 to 12,000. Other campaigning extras such as Fight or Arbitrate: How Should we Settle the Afghan Frontier, Who is to have the Sudan? Gordon, or the Slave Traders? and the Navy of Old England: Is it Ready for War?, helped to create an interest in foreign affairs.

	...William Stead left the Pall Mall Gazette in 1890. Henry Crust (1892-6) changed the journal from radical to independent conservative. Contributors to the newspaper over the years included John Ruskin, Oscar Wilde, H. G. Wells, and Rudyard Kipling. The newspaper also employed several talented illustrators including Sidney Sime, Frank Brangwyn, Leonard Raven-Hill, George Stampa, and Fred Pegram. The newspaper was incorporated into the Evening Standard in 1923.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/The_Pall_Mall_Gazette
	Several well-known writers contributed to The Pall Mall Gazette over the years. George Bernard Shaw gained his first job in journalism writing for the paper. Other contributors have included Anthony Trollope, Friedrich Engels, Oscar Wilde, Robert Louis Stevenson, Charles Whibley, Sir Spencer Walpole, Arthur Patchett Martin,[2] and Jamaican-born writer Eneas Sweetland Dallas.

	...References in popular culture


according to Stead:

https://books.google.com/books?id=KWhPAQAAMAAJ&pg=PA735&lpg=PA735
	One of the foremost, if not the foremost, of the Jingo journalists in London, flung it in my face the other day that he had taken his imperialism from my teaching in the "Pall Mall Gazette," and, he added, he considered that Mr. Seeley, but his book on "The Expansion of England," and myself in "Pall Mall Gazette" and "Review of Reviews," were the two persons who, more than any other men, had created modern Imperialism. When many of those who now vaunt themselves as Imperialists of the genuine brand were in the petticoats of infancy, I was labouring in the attempt to lay broad and deep the foundation of the Imperialistic faith.


Stead says he was "labouring ... to lay board and deep the foundation of the Imperialistic faith."


https://muse.jhu.edu/article/646781/summary

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Stop_the_War_Committee
	The Stop the War Committee was an anti-war organisation that opposed the Second Boer War. It was formed by William Thomas Stead in 1899.[1] Its president was John Clifford[2] and prominent members included Lloyd George and Keir Hardie. The group was generally seen as pro-Boer.[3]

	Against the background of political campaigning for the khaki election of 1900, Stop-The-War distributed millions of posters, cartoons and broadsheets, handing out leaflets to commuters on trains.[3]

	Its resolutions were religiously-inspired and utopian in their approach. The Committee united various Nonconformists who held different views in relation to socialism. However, the high moral tone of its pronouncements failed to achieve support from the working class, and provoked stronger antagonism than the more rational approach of the South African Conciliation Committee.[4]


Stead helping out with imperialism? apparently convinced Rhodes to subjugate South Africa, then during Boer war got to forefront of anti-war movement and did a bad job of it


...


https://www.britishnewspaperarchive.co.uk/search/results?NewspaperTitle=Pall+Mall+Gazette&BasicSearch=Bernard+Shaw

writings of Bernard Shaw for Pall Mall


http://upf.com/book.asp?id=RITSC001

http://www.rte.ie/centuryireland/index.php/articles/idiots-george-bernard-shaw-condemns-extremists-on-both-sides-of-the-irish-q



https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Roger_Casement
	Roger David Casement (1 September 1864 – 3 August 1916), formerly known as Sir Roger Casement CMG,[1] was an Irish nationalist who worked for the British Foreign Office as a diplomat and later became a humanitarian activist, poet and Easter Rising leader.[2] Described as the "father of twentieth-century human rights investigations",[3] he was honoured in 1905 for the Casement Report on the Congo and knighted in 1911 for his important investigations of human rights abuses in Peru. He then made efforts during World War I to gain German military aid for the 1916 Easter Rising that sought to gain Irish independence.[4]

	In Africa as a young man, Casement first worked for commercial interests before joining the British Colonial Service. In 1891 he was appointed as a British consul, a profession he followed for more than 20 years. Influenced by the Boer War and his investigation into colonial atrocities against indigenous peoples, Casement grew to distrust imperialism.

	...In August 1914, at the outbreak of World War I, Casement and John Devoy arranged a meeting in New York with the western hemisphere's top-ranking German diplomat, Count Bernstorff, to propose a mutually beneficial plan: if Germany would sell guns to the Irish revolutionaries and provide military leaders, the Irish would revolt against England, diverting troops and attention from the war with Germany. Bernstorff appeared sympathetic. Casement and Devoy sent an envoy, Clan na Gael president John Kenny, to present their plan personally. Kenny, while unable to meet the German Emperor, did receive a warm reception from Flotow, the German ambassador to Italy, and from Prince von Bülow.[citation needed]


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/SS_Libau
	Masquerading as SS Aud —an existing Norwegian vessel of similar appearance— Libau set sail from the Baltic port of Lübeck on 9 April 1916, under the Command of Karl Spindler, bound for the south-west coast of Ireland. Under Spindler was a crew of 22 men, all of whom were volunteers. Libau/Aud, laden with an estimated 20,000 rifles, 1,000,000 rounds of ammunition, 10 machine guns, and explosives (under a camouflage of a timber cargo), evaded patrols of both the British 10th Cruiser Squadron and local Auxiliary patrols.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Karl_Spindler_(naval_officer)
	It was part of a plan to land German arms in Ireland to assist Irish republicans in staging what would become the 1916 Rising. Spindler travelled to Berlin for further orders and met Casement there. However Casement preferred to travel on board a submarine which would accompany the Libau 


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/SS_Libau
	...At this point Roger Casement and his companions who had been landed by the submarine U-19 in Kerry had been captured in an old ringfort or rath, between Ardfert and Tralee .


ship captain Spindler went on to get released in prisoner swap and write racist book about it against English

https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1921/01/03/103526649.pdf

also in that article:

	
	"The submarine (conveying sir Roger Casement) knew nothing of our existence. It arrived in Tralee Bay the same evening and saw in the dusk the outline of Aud off Inishtooskert. Thinking, however, that it was an English destroyer, the submarine commander went off to the north and ladned Sir Roger and his companions by means of a folding boaot (Casement, as is know, was arrested the next morning near the spot where he landed).

	"Casement, I learned afteward, was toward the end of the voyage very silent and was apparently considering himself alone. It is strange that he did not urge the submarine commander to look for us and to give the signals as arranged by Casement himself."



https://www.independent.ie/irish-news/1916/rising-perspectives/was-roger-casements-trial-a-legal-travesty-34453005.html
	This was a fairly novel argument, and not one with which Casement was particularly comfortable. Helped by George Bernard Shaw, he had intended to use his defence as an opportunity to make a very public declaration of Ireland's cause. His friends, however, did not think he ought to testify at trial at all

	...There was significant international pressure brought to bear, and George Bernard Shaw, Arthur Conan Doyle, Douglas Hyde, John Dillon, Eva Gore-Booth, Cardinal Logue, Alice Stopford Green and William Butler Yeats were among those who supported Casement's appeal for clemency. 


what was going on here?

maybe Casement did bad job of helping Irish, doubtful tying independance movement to Germany during WWI would win public to their side


later:

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/German_Plot_(Ireland)
	The "German Plot" was a conspiracy alleged in May 1918 by the Dublin Castle administration in Ireland to exist between the Sinn Féin movement and the German Empire to start an armed insurrection in Ireland during World War I. The alleged conspiracy, which would have diverted the British war effort, was used to justify the internment of Sinn Féin leaders, who were actively opposing attempts to introduce conscription in Ireland.

	The "plot" originated on 12 April when the British arrested Joseph Dowling after he was put ashore in County Clare by a German U-boat.[1] Dowling had been a member of the Irish Brigade, one of several schemes by Roger Casement to get German assistance for the 1916 Easter Rising.[1] Dowling now claimed that the Germans were planning a military expedition to Ireland.[1] William Reginald Hall and Basil Thomson believed him and convinced the authorities to intern all Sinn Féin leaders.[1] 150 were arrested on the night of 16–17 May and taken to prisons in England.[1] 

	...The internment was counterproductive for the British, imprisoning the more accommodating Sinn Féin leadership while failing to capture members of the Irish Republican Brotherhood more committed to physical force republicanism.[3] This allowed Michael Collins to consolidate his control of the organisation and put it on a more focused military footing.[4]


previously:

https://books.google.com/books?id=Y_KUdKwu3hAC&pg=PA8&lpg=PA8&
	Less than twelve months before the Mail's warning about approaching stormy seas, the influential journalist W.T. Stead had suggested that Birtain's preoccupation in South Africa made an invasion of Britain by Germany and France a real possiblity. German waiters in London, he speculated, might act as saboteurs--a theme soon to be found in early spy fiction. The cry was taken up elsewhere. Lord Roberts of Kandahar, hero of the Boer War and Britain's most popular living general, campaigned energetically on behalf of the National Service League, a pressure group for conscription. The government discounted the threat, but predictably it inspired dramatic scare-mongering in the popular press.

	What gave edge to this speculation was the belief that an invasion would be helped by foreign spies. Spy fever climaxed in 1908-09 during a national debate over the Anglo-German naval race, when public fears of German military might--led to a flurry of reported sightings of spies. 


https://books.google.com/books?id=yz8UDgAAQBAJ&pg=PA181&lpg=PA181
	He suggested that the long-drawn-out propaganda not only shaped the British public, but possibly Birtain's militarists and Junkers--or at least empowered their beliefs and positions. Shaw argued that pitting Germany as England's enemy started with the popular 1871 novel The Battle of Dorking, which depicts a German invasion of Britain. This had been picked up and furthered by W. T. Stead and his like-minded romanticizing journalists and others who contributed to and propagandized the militarist mindset. Shaw wrote:

		...The lead given by The Battle of Dorking was taken up by articles in the daily press and magazines. Later on came the Jingo fever . . . , Stead's Truth about the Navy, Mr. Spenser Wilkinson, the suppression of the Channel Tunnel, Mr. Robert Blatchford, Mr. Gavin, Admiral Maxse, Mr. Newbolt, Mr. Rudyard Kipling


	...Shaw had remembered Stead's "The Truth about the Navy" series of articles in The Pall Mall Gazette from September to December 1884, dating to the beginning of Stead's and Shaw's respective rises within journalism and beyond. Stead's Navy campaign, which pre-dated his "Maiden Tribute to Modern Babylon" series, was the series that first gainted Stead much attention. Its insitence on greater government spending on Britain's navy, it should be recalled, rallied the British public to demand an increase iItn naval spending out of fear of being attacked by other Eurpoean countries. It was a classic example of modern fear journalism.


https://books.google.com/books?id=Y_KUdKwu3hAC&pg=PA8&lpg=PA8&
	Lord Roberts, for one, solemnly told the House of Lords that there were some 80,000 German soldiers in various disguises already within the United Kingdom. In official quarters much of this was sensibly discounted as hysteria, and when war finally came in 1914 the government could find only twenty-one alleged German agents to arrest.